I think some combination of the above probably does it, but it’s hard to say the exact chemistry of it. Consider the prime counterexample — Barack Obama — who was elected in a statewide, then nationwide race. He never represented a House district, so he could never be pulled heavily left by the local party. He never had a record to trail him as he ran for Senate (#1). He ran in a big state, but he lucked out when his opponents either disappeared (Jim Ryan) or became jokes (Alan Keyes) (#2). The state apparatus was glad to have Obama rather than scandal-plagued Ryan. Latent racism is less of a problem in Illinois, one of the more currently reliable liberal states (# 3 and 4). Additionally, latent racism may have simply diminished over the years (as compared to, say, the response of the country to Jesse Jackson’s presidential campaign).
I’m in hog heaven.
It is only sheer ignorance and lack of proper understanding of Sikhi that have led others to question the purpose of Rehat Maryada based on conjectures. To understand this we need to look at the history of the Sikh Panth and the political struggle it went through during the British rule. In 1849, the British annexed the Sikh kingdom and took strong measures to destabilize the Sikhs. The Sikh army was reduced significantly and replaced with Anglo and Indian soldiers. Forts, weapon factories and Sikh schools were closed down. All Sikh Gurdwaras were taken over by the British and their control was handed over to the Sanatan Hindu priests. Muslims and Hindus had the right to run their own Gurdwaras but this was not the case with the Sikhs. It was done to suppress the mighty Sikh power which was the only opposing force left in India. There still remained large number of Sikh groups that had started to reform.
L: Done! Bye.
I'll be reading from the book, signing copies and generally making myself available for anyone who wants to pop by.
YOU GUYS ARE THE BESTEST IN THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD!
The usual phony doom and gloom about Social Security
Certainly Michael Hardt and Antonio Negri have argued in texts like Empire and Multitude that the individual is no longer the primary socio-political actor, but that groups in the traditional sense, like economic classes or nations, tied to specific types of people or territories, are also obsolete. In their place are complex new formations like multi-national corporations and NGO’s, supra-individual entities that keep changing and mutating, with indefinite borders and fuzzy parameters, defying localized notions of time and space, having their own nettimes and netspaces. This process of course began to radically increase with the weaving of our world together with the industrial revolution, first with railroads and steamships carrying people and goods, then the wiring of the globe together with telegraph, telephone, and television, carrying sounds and images from afar with incredible speed.
The international design system also allows an applicant who does not reside in a contracting party of the Hague system to apply for protection so long as applicants have a connection to a member country – be it a state or an intergovernmental organization. This was notably the case of applicants from the United States of America.
Eight months!
The hearts are chipboard (old Inque Boutique 12x12 chipboard set that's been in my stash for ages), the letter stickers are from Authentique, the pearl and lace trim is by May Arts. The part that probably took me the longest - deciding on which American Crafts Thickers to use (in the end, the ampersand from the Amy Tangerine Goodness White set and numbers from the Heart set won out).
My Papa best, my papa best is the only advertisement (remember dhara ad?) breezes through my mind, just with the thought of my papa!. I'm sure every son and daughters in the world would feel the same.
And time will last for evermore
By the rising flood waters,
IHS Global analyst Tim Urquhart said in a report on Tuesday that Akema and Evonik together account for half the global production capacity of PA-12.
The soprano vocals make the song comical, taking the edge off the lyrics, and the musical interludes are deftly executed. One flaw comes with this humorous presentation: we have to wonder how the composer feels about the song's subject? Is he sympathetic towards her, or is she an object of ridicule, responsible for her own circumstances? It's unclear...and given that his oldest daughter was two years younger than this song's titular figure, that doesn't sit well with me.
I Absolutely Love Toddler-hood right now, but I am missing the baby time occasionally.
and now i can see
Admittedly, it’s always a bit of an adventure to see if I’ll achieve the desired fluffy state. If anyone has a fool-proof method for achieving said fluffiness, please advise. But please don’t tell me to buy the mix… don’t want to do it.
Here are some different styles.
I see beautifully formatted scrapbook pages in shops and online but they often only have one picture per page and a lot of design detail. My books are not designed to win any contests or impress anyone. They are for my enjoyment (hubby might look at this one more time in the next 10 years) and will take me back to a warm, wonderful vacation when I am freezing in Michigan next January.
the 1920′s, many of his techniques involving unorthodox
VIDEOS FROM BRAVOLAND -- the Afrikaner 's 'independent country in cyberspace...'
Arkansas had the final neither here nor there victory over Oklahoma was ecstatic, leapfrogging over Texas to claim the volunteer tulsa oklahoma over Purdue 49-0, 1st-ranked Oregon over UCLA 60-13, 4th-ranked TCU over Air Force 38-7, 9th-ranked Utah over Colorado State 59-6, 15th-ranked Arizona over Washington 44-14, 7th-ranked Alabama over Tennessee 41-10, 23rd-ranked Virginia Tech over Duke 44-7, and 25th-ranked Miami-FL over North Carolina 33-10.
optics known to us, they're martial
I'm so happy it's a four day weekend!!! Driving home today, I actually thought it was Friday! I'm usually kind of bummed that I'm not in school, but lately I've been just fine leaving at a normal time everyday! I can't really pinpoint a reason; "blah" seems to be my theme. However, after this weekend, I will be ::squee-cited::!!
"I knew they moved. Maybe that other one is defective. I think you have a defective table, you should call the company and get them to replace it. See this one moves just like this."
Wanting to sleep longer and more often than usual.
Sometimes I have to remind myself of this.
“The Measure of a Man and of an Angel will be the same in the New Jerusalem“
Anyway, you know me and my whole “food is just future shit” take on fine dining, but this place was yum. And by “yum,” I mean the waiters. Holy crap, I am totally NOT the let’s-go-see-the-Chippendales type—au contraire—but there is something to be said for having extremely nice looking men wait on you.
will creak open to reveal the latest treasures from the artists of EHAG.
Surah 4: An-Nisa’: 2,
The battle was quite straightforward but with some nice terrain to take cover. I placed a bunker near the NI’s deployment zone just because of the slight difference in points, and off we went with the game. We deployed and started moving around.
Good Grief…. I hope I don’t wake up from Surgery to the realization that I just had breast augmentation surgery…. thanks to Dad’s impassioned letter to my Surgeon…..
It is not a matter of learning detachment, but of keeping awake. Attachment gives you pain. But if, instead of trying to escape, you try to keep awake, you will meet openly and understand every experience. If you are attached and are satisfied with your state, you experience no disturbance. Only in time of pain and suffering do you want the opposite, which you think will give you relief. If you are attached to a person, and there is peace and quiet, everything moves smoothly for a while; then something happens that gives you pain. Take, for example, a husband and wife; in their possession, in their love, there is complete blindness, happiness. Life goes smoothly until something happens – he may leave, or she may fall in love with another. Then there is pain. In such a situation you say to yourself, “I must learn detachment.” But if you love again you repeat the same thing. Again, when you experience pain in attachment, you desire the opposite. That is human nature; that is what every human being wants.
“Just one, please. I think that’s all I should have.” I smoothed the robe down over my hips self-consciously.
Ever since I heard the title track featured on the "Bite Hard" compilation it has been one of my most loved pieces of library music. The combination of subterranean bass and hard-as-nails breakbeats fitted my tastes so perfectly it was like the track had been made specifically for me. When I discovered there was a record of the same name I knew I had to hear it. Thanks to the generosity of Retronic that has now happened and I am pleased to report that all the qualities that make "Hard Hitter" such an epic piece of music translate through to the other 14 tracks on the album.
The theme this fortnight is
“What happened?” I asked Bug. “Were you bothering the dog?”
Beanie definitely responds to the sticker workbook as an incentive to finish her coloring pages. I also discovered that it’s helpful to ask her, when she gets distracted, “What color will you use now? What will you color with that?” She flashes a big smile and gets back to her work quickly. Since her math assignment yesterday featured a relatively complex color by numbers picture, and she really dislikes being told HOW to color, I had no small amount of trepidation about the length of time it might take to get her to complete her work, but she did quite well; actually, she surprised me when I opened her book to the color by numbers exercise and she looked at it, looked up at me, and told me what colors of crayons she would need for each number. Granted, it’s not that hard to decipher, but I usually have to get her to focus on the page first. Yesterday, she leaned over as soon as I opened the book and explained to me what her assignment would be, instead of the other way around.
Aren't you ever worried that your heads will explode when you wear balaclavas and jump around a lot?
Prestyn - Ivory Size 6
Now? How strange is the idea of writing posts when I need them, and how cheerful to be able to post only a few times a week. I imagine it's like free-falling for a while and then realizing your feet are on solid, grassy ground. The only problem now is actually getting the old schedule to start working again.
I had also been having other signs here and there that something was about to happen.
I would go with "little" here. Your opinion?
Which works catching chances, when he thinks to win more than places, as in the example above. And he is ruining the chances when going to win less than raises. Which places can have either positive or negative Expected depending on whether he catches the chances of either destroying them. If you bet $ 50 to win $ 10, when the odds of 4 to 1, you have a negative Expected $ 2 bet, since on average four times you win $ 10, but once you lose $ 50, which will amount to a loss of $ 10 after five bids. On the other hand, if you bet $ 30 to win $ 10, when the probability of winning 4 to 1 doyles room rakeback, you have a positive expectation to $ 2, because you once again win four times for $ 10 and lose only $ 30 once, which gives the total profit of $ 10. Waiting indicates that the first rate is bad, and the second is good.
Pizzelle
Keep in mind that these outlooks are updated several times by the Storm Prediction Center and could move around a bit. To see the most up to date outlook - click here.
Thank you for your time and consideration. I look forward to share the entire manuscript with you at your request.
Of a summer night in Spain,
Michael D. D. White
Code and problems
Very often, producers and participants of these themed events we call Renaissance Faires lose sight of what the event actually represents. The following is what I wrote as a definition for the event I direct in Sebastopol. It's a statement of intent which all participants are required to read, understand, and use as a basis for their activities:
By HOLBROOK MOHR
Today at 100 degrees with high humidity and hormones I long for those air conditioned days where one can work and relax with out getting sweaty and sticky, one can sleep through the night without waking up drenched in sweat, the room full of light from the street lamps because it’s too hot to cover the open windows with curtains or shades. One has more energy, one is more productive, one is not so hard on oneself for feeling so tired and lazy in these long days of summer.
Baby, It’s Cold Outside = Worst. Christmas song. Ever.
What about the photos you post on facebook and your profile pictures across social media? If a picture is worth 1,000 words, what does your profile pic say?
I like being single, especially at this point in my life. But there are times when my conviction wavers. Like when my sister’s husband drops us off in front of the movie theater so we don’t have to walk from the parking lot in the rain.
I write: because it challenges me
We know there is more. Sometimes we feel safe enough to explore what that means for us, exploring our faith. For others of us, we feel scared out of our skin. There are a few brave souls who venture outside of the family faith, often to face much consternation and ridicule.
23:00 – 00:30 Tartaros
Our owner was trying to make us pay a ridiculous amount of money in pet rent...more than twice the previous owner had required!
Yep, things are looking better .
and this mother
Women undergoing IVF were assessed to see if they were suitable to be hypnotised. Eighty-nine women were then given hypnosis while their embryos were implanted. Some underwent more than one cycle of IVF treatment. Ninety-six other women underwent embryo transfers without hypnosis. All received one cycle each. Dr Eliahu Levitas, who led the research, told the conference: “Embryo transfer is known to be a stressful time for patients, and it may be that the procedure is the peak of their stress in IVF. “Hypnosis may be related to a tranquilising effect. “Performing embryo transfer under hypnosis may significantly contribute to an increased clinical pregnancy rate.”
“Isn’t this usual?” said Joseph. “I’ll bet nearly everyone in this jail didn’t do what they’re told they did.”
My phone number is ___, and my address, ___ Brentwood, TN, 37027. My fax number is ___. Please contact me if you wish to consider my book. I know that I may and most likely won’t be successful on my first try, but that does not mean I didn’t try at all. Thank-you for your time and patience with this letter.
In things like an Obama presidential speech, Lubiano continues, “None of these words are accidental choices.” No kidding.
This over-glorification is not unique to travel, but it is more prevalent in travel largely because travel is seemingly more conducive to storytelling. People usually travel for several days or weeks and, upon returning, feel compelled to discuss their experiences.* This demand for storytelling, combined with the mechanisms discussed above, results in an overly positive take on travel that is frequently discussed. This leads to two main harms: People like my former professor are ostracized for their preferences, and certain groups of people travel more than they optimally should because of the benefits that flow from discussing their travels afterwards. So, next time you’re about to talk about your travels, really think about what you enjoyed and what you didn’t and please, don’t use the word “perspective”.
Boludo/a (m/f)
I continue finding myself in another part of the world, letting the days go by, water holding me down, and questioning, constantly: what have I done? Everyday, everything is still the same as it ever was. I know this cycle needs to change, yet, up until this point have felt paralyzed to change it. Most people would say to make a list each night before going to sleep and then have a starting point when I get up the next morning. In fact, most of the self-help books out there say just that. But how do you get it through the head of somebody like me, who has tried this, day in and day out, and still can’t manage to break the cycle of stagnation and stupid craziness?
CANNING HS, PHILLIPS J, ALLSUP S. Health care worker beliefs about influenza vaccine and reasons for non-vaccination – a cross sectional survey. J Clin Nurs 2005; 14: 922-925.
Tip: Experiment with making your own colours. Mix Both Re-Inkers and Food Colouring together for some great colours.
In her decision Judge Rup wrote: "Like many retired persons, the Paczkowskis maintain two residences and divide their time between the two locations. While they may have focused their lives in Florida for over 20 years, it is reasonable to accept that they have now decided to re-focus their lives on the community where Richard was raised and they began their married life."
This is not to say he's peachy keen 100% of the time, or even 80% but I do think that I'm back to seeing the light at the end of the tunnel. And hey, at least we've got a great song to add to the soundtrack of J's first days.
Usually, I try to add in a little foreplay myself but since this was a test, I figured we would pass. After some time, actually about normal, I felt that old familiar feeling and it was over. Mission accomplished. Now it was verified– everything works!!
shit… as a foster parent I’ve made mistakes that would make other people question my sanity – I’ve had baby kittens die in my car of unknown causes – and each and every time it happens I question if this is what I should still be doing. Did I miss anything? Did I not pay attention enough?
1) How to sew, Mom is a seamstress. An excellent one! Somehow she managed to teach me how to sew. I hate patterns and just like to create. Any idea what that can do to a seamstress!?
Cornflour
They have generously donated the yummy goodies featured here. Cherry blossoms, roses and lace Oh My!!!
UPDATE at 400 and 430pm CDT 5/1/2012:
I did struggle for the first few days though because I felt guilty that he bought me something so expensive. We're not "expensive gift" kind of people, especially since we've been trying to get out of debt! I really felt like we should take it back because the last time Justin bought be a very expensive gift was when he bought me a video camera and we took it back only a couple weeks later when Justin lost his job....that was in 2009!!!! I'm not used to spending that much on myself! Justin refused to let me take it back though, so I'm just trying to enjoy it and get over the expense part. Unlike Justin who allows the kids to play games on his iPad every once in a while....I don't let them play with my Kindle. Mean? Maybe, but then when I do let Alec play "Where's My Water?" his favorite game, so I can nap while the little ones are napping...it makes it more special and exciting! :o)
I have a passion for ballet. The first time I saw any form of ballet was “Swan lake on ice” c. 1990. It was instant love at first sight and since then I have seen 8 versions of Swan Lake among many other shows including Graeme Murphy’s take on Swan Lake both here in Australia and in Paris. Lucky me.
“dressy casual”
According to the UN development report, you need 400 billion to stop environmental destruction and 200 billion to end poverty.
Overpopulation
With anything they ever used—they’ve grown into yer heart:
Mid-way through the 2009-10 NBA season the Boston Celtics looked to be a team on the decline. Having already won an NBA championship with the Big 3 of Kevin Garnett, Ray Allen, and Paul Pierce in 2008, the dream of a second championship had already been wiped from the minds of much of the basketball world. Talks swirled around the trade deadline of moving Ray Allen and thus breaking up the once dominating big 3.
For some reason I have been signed up to attend another one of those Work Health check thingies. By myself. How do I get myself into these things? Anyway, I guess I need some symptoms, since that's the whole point, right? I get myself a set of symptoms, go in and tell them all about it, and they say I will die in a week? It's so relaxing knowing those doctors and nurses are coming round to our workplaces to look after us.
These are the albums that have gotten me through rough times, good times, desperate times.
OK, so I couldn't play "Mary Had A Little Lamb" but I did create synthesizer sounds by just thinking about them. I thought that this was pretty cool but not many people understood it at the time. They were two young kids that did get it. They bought a few balloons and sneaked up behind my lawn chair and popped the balloons. As I have a slow shock response nothing happened but about ten minutes later a yellow jacket (I hate yellow jackets) came buzzing around my head and the synthesizers went crazy.
Hugs and love~
DO NOT REPLY TO THIS MESSAGE. IF YOU HAVE QUESTIONS, PLEASE USE THE CONTACTS IN THE MESSAGE OR CALL THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC AFFAIRS AT 202-514-2007.
The man Rolling Stone named as the greatest guitarist of all time, Jimi Hendrix, died on September 18, 1970, in London. His death still remains a mystery. His girlfriend, Monika Dannemann, claimed he took 9 of her extremely powerful Vesparax sleeping pills; not reading that the dose was only a half of a pill. The doctor who attended Hendrix, John Bannister, claimed he had died after choking on his own vomit which was mainly red wine. Bannister was later found guilty of two accounts of malpractice for not performing a tracheotomy on Hendrix. A popular conspiracy theory claims that Hendrix’s manager, Mike Jeffrey killed him because the rock star wanted to end his contract.
Hello Pilgrim Pearl Bracelet in Green by Lizzy House
I’d definitely give that round to Bobby Brents.
I certainly give Joe Konrath lots of credit for trying to put forth a most creative and different kind of thriller involving clones of famous people. And for the most part his wise-cracking dialogue held my attention, too. But int he final analysis, I just thought he tried to hard in this over-the-top novel. I just think it would be a very difficult thriller to sell to our sales force in a major way. The credibility factor is strained a wee bit too much. As such, I'm returning it with my regrets, but with my thanks for the look. - Warner Books
#Only, I don’t know how
Chapter 5 deals with discussion on domestic security. In this day and age, freedom from fear and threat has become the new focus of domestic security policy. Statistics show that in most Western nations, domestic crime such as violence and property crime has declined. However, the fear and threat of perceived crime has risen to new heights. The state uses counter law 1 and 2 in order to decrease the threat of crime. Specifically, there are four types of laws against laws that are used to tackle uncertainty and threats in the domestic sphere:
"Won't they look for us here?"
Saturday afternoon we made cards to send to various people we each wished to encourage. I can't post mine here because they haven't been sent yet, despite it being me who said we should all take stamped addressed envelopes with us so we could post on the way home. I forgot.
Little Joe never once gave it away
they were roosting in the corners,
how your words
Now, what to do with my cute little iron urns for Christmas? After some online searching I found a few ideas, but since I am short on TIME these days, I needed something super speedy... running through the aisles at Hobby Lobby during the 50% of Christmas sale, inspiration struck like a directive from Santa himself.
From La Paz it is a nice ride that winds around around the lake and includes getting off the bus for a short ferry ride. For the Lonely Planet toting tourist a trip to Copacabana is avoidable without making the trip to the islands on the lake. Visiting Isla del Sol is just one of those tourist things that everyone does. At the moment, however, Mika and I are really not in the mood for sight-seeing. Chalk up these islands as something else we will need to see on our next visit to Bolivia.
The choice is yours.
I felt like I was right back where I was before the trip. Going through the motions. Not doing anything wrong, not "wasting my life away"...just not doing anything truly fulfilling. I was content with it before, but after getting a taste of it in Panama I no longer was okay with my usual routine.
Here's to a better tomorrow!!!!
The injured officers have been named as PC Paul Madden, 23, and PCSO Piotr Dolata, 27.
The Great Commission
I need to feel the sun.
The world around me came to a stop,
In relation to the National Register, significant means historically significant. In order to be historically significant a property must have high levels of integrity and be significant under one of the criteria for evaluation of the National Register. Local, state, and national levels of significance may be different; i.e. a property may be significant locally (perhaps a barn where defining town events happened) but not nationally (as it would have to be important to the shaping of the nation). In short, when you read significance think historically significant and National Register.
Proclamation No. 1064 does not violate the Comprehensive Agrarian Reform Law. Private claimants further assert that Proclamation No. 1064 violates the provision of the Comprehensive Agrarian Reform Law (CARL) or RA No. 6657 barring conversion of public forests into agricultural lands. They claim that since Boracay is a public forest under PD No. 705, President Arroyo can no longer convert it into an agricultural land without running afoul of Section 4(a) of RA No. 6657, thus:
Halfway to Each Other is Susan’s amazing story of how she and her husband of 18 years were just about to call it quits but chose a different path. Susan was accomanying her husband on a business trip in Italy and upon their return, they were all set to divorce. Something on the last day on their trip clicked for the two of them and instead of going home and filing for divorce, they gathered up their two children, and spent a year in Italy rediscovering what it was that brought them together in the first place.
For sixteen years, Alyssa Gardner has lived with the stigma of being descended from Alice Liddell -- the real life inspiration for Lewis Carroll's famed novel, Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland. But cruel jokes about dormice and tea parties can’t compare to the fact that Alyssa hears the whispers of bugs and flowers ... the same quirk which sent her mother to a mental institution years before.
While apologising for any offence caused, the statement read: “Google views the integrity of our search results as an extremely important priority.”
The past few weeks have been wet, windy and often cold. Even so, spring is here and the fields, garden and Forest are flush with new foliage in so many shades of green. The scent of blossom and new grass is everywhere. Underfoot there are puddles and wet mud.
Meanwhile, here in Austin, our international passenger service continues to be anemic. We’re barely able to sustain service to Cancun on an ongoing basis.
We read a lot more stories before we prayed, sang songs, and bundled the tiny people into their beds. That particular story, however, kept coming back to me, because it reminded me of our morning struggle with the sight words. Yes, Bugaboo needs to know her sight words; yes, she needs to learn to follow instructions; yes, she needs to learn that sometimes the tasks set before us are not our favorite things to do. That said, my job is to encourage and teach, and perhaps, in simply giving her a list of words and telling her to read them to me, then digging in my heels as stubbornly as she dug in hers, I taught her a lesson in inflexibility instead of the personal pronouns. There will, of course, be times where a certain thing has to be learned in a certain way; this morning’s vocabulary exercise wasn’t one of them, but because I insisted on making it so, it turned into a cause of strife. In Ephesians 4, I’m reminded that my words should be uplifting and edifying. Telling a little kid she’s being stubborn isn’t particularly edifying; it’s analogous to telling water it’s wet.
Cambodia is lovely so far, very different from Thailand, the poverty is alot more obvious. People want to sell you everything and Matt and I have a hard time saying no. Parents will send their children out with things to sell and won’t pick them up until all is sold, and there are land mine victims begging on the beach. These are the two groups we have been trying to reserve our extra money for, but I have a feeling that we will be a tad over budget by the time we leave.
of the flypaper that once wrapped you,
The third and final film in Chrisopher Nolan’s Batman trilogy will be released on July 27. Above is the latest trailer. How will the trilogy end? Will Tom Hardy’s portrayal of Bane be anything close to the genius of the late Heath Ledger’s Joker from 2008′s The Dark Knight? Is Anne Hathaway’s Catwoman a friend or a foe to Batman? Will the film get any Oscar love? Why does the trailer make the movie seem so sad?
Space: 1999--Rocket Scientists
Some thoughts on this outfit… I played around with the pieces for this set over a period of time, and even the shirt I just added a few days ago because it compliments the chestpiece so well. Unfortunately for most, the chestpiece is a LW’ing piece that binds on pickup. An alternative might be the Nightshade Tunic with the same shirt or a plain red shirt, or the Cabalist Chestpiece on its own. On her feet, I put sandals, because I think sandals look great and so fitting on a Night Elf. I am currently still seeking out more sandals in-game, and I have yet to find a transmoggable pair in cloth. Lastly, her weapon. Once I saw Terokk’s Quill with this outfit as I was building it, I knew no other polearm would do.
There is one fair comment to be made against JUICE. That it is an experiment, not an observatory. When money is tight, space missions should be flexible, able to carry out science goals across all the fields of astronomy. JUICE is limited to studying one moon system. Of course, there are many observatories in existence (not many for X-Ray or gravitational waves, but there are some), and there are many experiments (the LHC is probably the most famous example). But we need all sorts of approaches to make the scientific community work to the best of its ability.
Sometimes I get lonely and all I gotta do is think of you
How to Bake the Perfect Life
The connections, coincidences, none of it is accidental.
It used to make me a little nervous to sit still, but not anymore. Wait a minute, maybe I am the one getting older! Thank goodness I am married to such an energetic young guy who will keep me out of my rocking chair for years to come. Watch out 50, here I come!
If you are looking for the silver lining to this rather dark cloud then for the first time is his 15 year Chairmanship Robin Tilbrook is in the situation where the majority of his councillors were actually elected as EDP.
Associated Press China votes with Russia and against the West. This willingness to act in a way so far counter to what would appear to be its normal interest is an important signal. Beijing is sending a message about its evolving attitude toward the US …
I respond with a questioning look that says, “Is this okay to eat raw?” and warily place a piece on my tongue.
Developers waiting for sympathy from the public for their reduced circumstances will be waiting some time, such is the general outrage at the consequences of the financial crisis and the role of developers (as borrowers whose debts are now in trouble and necessitating bailouts for the banks from the pockets of the nation). €170,000-a-year part-timer, Frank Daly at NAMA has suggested that it might be patriotic for developers to work for nothing and others have suggested the minimum wage. That’s all very well but what moral high ground does NAMA occupy when it is paying its CEO a guaranteed €430,000 per annum and a bonus of up to 60% on top?
probably by quite a bit.
I still don't. I am living on a spinning ball of solidified magma, hurtling through dark space at 29.79 km per second, while our solar system is orbiting around a black hole (the center of our galaxy) every 225 million years. I don't need to be reminded about existential anguish by a painting, especially when the original title was "The Shriek of Nature." Less screaming, more healing.
Hair styles are one thing that go in and out of style before you even walk out the door the your latest hair appointment. I’ve seen it all. As someone who is particularly OCD about their hair, I find comfort in paying too much for a haircut in order to feel like I am
"But you didn't see her the day before? Is that also correct?"
Photo: Carol Fairweather
Starting from Marsfield at 6:30 AM
943 ***D-V/1/1986. “Article VII of the Constitution of 1797 and the Aftermath.” Gannett Lecture Series, Rochester Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York. (Incorporated in Item C-1986(6), above, and in Item B-4, above, pp. 215-34, 327 (1989).)
The best revolution would be the realization that all of us are connected at some level. Our individual selves are necessary, but they aren’t sufficient for living in the fullness of reality.
4 plaster
So really, can it be fall now? I'm ready to move on to a more hospitable season.
That was the night I realized how deep his love ran for me. That was the night, one day after the birth of our son, that our love began to really take root.
The reality is that you cannot change what has happened. You cannot restore lives to where they were before the event. The only choice you have is over what you do next. You can either choose is to be restored or to re-offend.
If you missed the blog hop on Friday, there is still time to join in! A fun collaboration between The Rubber Cafe and Really Reasonable Ribbon. Click here for all the details!
In a recent trend, the field of social-personality psychology has become sensitive to the data reporting and analytic strategies that go into the publication of a research paper. Today at the “False Positive Findings are Frequent Findable and Fixable” symposium at SPSP the three speakers presented some very polarizing observations about this trend in our field.
In his travels through Persia (today’s Iran) Christ became known as Yuz Asaf (leader of the Healed). We know this because a Kashmiri historical document confirms that Isa (the Koranic name for Christ) was in fact also known as Yuz Asaf. The Jami – uf – Tamarik, Volume II, tells that Yuz Asaf visited Masslige, where he attended the grave of Shem, Noah’s son. There are various other accounts such as Agha Mustafa’s “Awhali Shahaii-i-paras” that tell of Yuz Asaf’s travels and teachings all over Persia. It seems that Yuz Asaf blessed Afghanistan and Pakistan with his presence also. There are for example two plains in Eastern Afghanistan near Gazni and Galalabad, bearing the name of the prophet Yuz Asaf. Again in the Apocryphal Acts of Thomas, Thomas says that he and Christ attended the Court of King Gundafor of Taxila (now Pakistan), in about 47AD, and that eventually both the King and his brother accepted Christ’s teachings. Kersten claims that there are more than twenty one historical documents that bear witness to the existence of Jesus in Kashmir, where he was known also as Yuz Asaf and Issa. For example the Bhavishyat Mahapurana (volume 9 verses 17-32) contains an account of Issa-Masih (Jesus the Messiah). It describes Christ’s arrival in the Kashmir region of India and his encounter with King Shalivahana, who ruled the Kushan area (39-50AD), and who entertained Christ as a guest for some time.
The Union of South Africa, another war and a rebellion.
Note: I’ve included Barter Card because it is an interesting take on the marketplace metaphor and because it does actually achieve some form of collaboration and sourcing of resources from outside of the business. It just happens that the resources in question are more tangible than the intellectual capital being exchanged in the traditional open innovation space.
What was going on in Germany in the early 70’s that they were able to produce such kick ass world class heavy rock? And what’s wrong with the world that the music of Lucifer’s Friend and Night Sun are not being played on your local classic rock radio station right now? The debut albums from both of these bands are required listening for all fans of the mid-tempo hard n heavy realm.
The set broke the Topps record for the most subsets
Still struggling uphill
On to some food. Old Town White Coffee is a chain coffee shop started in Ipoh, Malaysia. Their claim to fame is their white coffee which is baked coffee beans instead of roasted, or is it the milk and sugar they add to make this otherwise decent drink into a sweet, adrenalin boosting, diabetic killing slurry of muck. I always ask for my coffee black at Old Town, it still comes with sugar added.
Because the exerciser is a weighted ball, it’s unlike something that is designed to stay inside the vaginal opening without falling out. It rolls out, and the goal is for the woman to be able to use her muscles to hold it in and prevent it from rolling out.
But he said that privately “they’re probably more scared shitless about the pools than they are about the cores. They know they’re really risky and dangerous.”
Inggredients:
Why do publishers bother? They want to protect their investment and not have a diluted market when releasing their book. That’s the argument I’ve heard anyway.
After receiving what appeared to be a look of bewilderment…followed by a semi-smile from my ex…I came to find out a few more answers to some questions that I had…
Among the benefits that a good financial advisor can offer is some protection from ourselves. We all suffer from a variety of inherent weaknesses and behavioral biases that conflict with our best financial interests. This is an underappreciated and vital role. Unfortunately, it is often better accomplished in theory than in execution.
Note: This article was first published in the old Temasek Review in March 2010.
with help from Lido Jackson & his guitar on Boogie Street
Details will appear here Thursday. Tune back in then.
And so, if you have a few extra bucks, or even if you have a few bucks you can’t really spare, money that, if accumulated over a long enough time might be one ticket out of your misery, you blow it all on a temporary pleasure, just to briefly get your mind off that long-term pain.
At 17:00 H, a bunch of foul-mouthed critters are playing in our rather barren asphalt jungle. It is a slick-proper opportunity for me to ransack their riddles but my lenses are too idle to capture any of their muscular activities. Watching strangers sets myself into being lost in transition (not translation) - I am all too eager to photograph them and their peculiar stares but I am almost always too insufficient to act upon my ardour.
I am writing this post to let you know how much I hate how you let him slip away. You just don’t know how much it pisses me off every day that you were too afraid to tell him you wish that he would stay. You make me sick with all the things that you never said. If anyone knows how to get the best of me, it’s you. You’re my best friend and your mind was dead to me.
I’m a dreamer by nature. I’ve always loved make believe and how it can apply to real life. Being a movie buff as a tween/teen, I used to deconstruct films scene by scene and then add my preferences or touches. Life moved on, and I married. My love for storytelling gained new breath, when I had my kids. They grew and kept me more than busy. But about four years ago, I decided it was time to do more. Thus –
In the morning, however, there was no phone call. They just showed up and since Sweet Pea had already awakened me (she has one of those bodies that wakes up between 6 & 7am no matter what time she goes to bed - it's maddening) I heard them open the sliding glass door downstairs to let our cat Clark in, who had stayed out all night. So, we got up and made breakfast and then I got to work. With entertaining grandparents here I was able to grab the vacuum and clean up the carpets. Then I took a shower and Slipshod left for his overnight business trip. After that I attacked all the yucky spots on the carpets with the shampooer. Our clothes dryer stopped making heat a few days ago so since we can no longer use it to dry (until we get it fixed, of course, but I have yet to call a repair shop) and we had been talking about using non-electric ways to dry our clothes anyway, before the grandparents left and while The Bug was napping I ran out to the hardware store and bought a wooden drying rack which shall now do its duty in the guest room bathtub except when the tub is needed for actual people washing. I also bought some clothesline and clothes pins for the back yard and tomorrow I get to figure out where I'm going to tie the line and hang the clothes. Once I get that worked out I'll need to rewash a load and a half of laundry. We did not have enough hangers or shower rails to get everything out and hung up to dry when the dryer died. Stinky!
Height: 60cm
Not only am I selling Avon, I am also building a downline. I am working on becoming a Unit Leader. I like that I am earning money by both selling and mentoring other Representatives. It’s been keeping me busy, but I am loving it.
Let that rebel against the "system", inside of you, speak volumes back to these people that feel they know what is 'best for you' and that you should NOT have a voice. That is what upsets me the most. This is NOT what our Founding Fathers, and God, had in mind when they spoke of liberty. We must take back what is now becoming an out of control Empire. So, no matter if you are a Christian or an Atheist, Democrat or Independent. Even if you swear allegiance to Optimus Prime, we must stop these "Megatron" cronies from taking control.
But I didn’t! I left 1/4 of the salmon there and some of the cauliflower. I did eat all of the cold broccoli salad cause it was delish! And I left quite a bit of my salad too. It was just a nice day to see myself not have to eat. I felt like a size 00 girl even though I’m still rollin in my size 12s.
The end of the academic year is almost upon us and summer break is just around the corner. Do you have any exciting summer plans? How about this: apply for the summer marketing internship at the Embassy of Australia in Washington, DC and gain valuable work experience all while promoting studying in Australia. Sound like a dream? Well you could make this dream a reality!
We had converged upon a cultural flashpoint. In regard to historical accuracy, I know I made the right call in having my characters unquestionably accept slavery as the way the gods fated some people to live.
Cuttlebug cut and emboss 3" die & embossing folder "TREE TOPS"- 7.00 BRAND NEW
Separately mix the olive oil, vinegar, salt, pepper, and Cajun seasoning in a small bowl. Pour over salad ingredients. Serve immediately.
Now you're all inspired, go forth a bake!
In each case, at least one brick is carried by the participant throughout the course and collected at the end. All bricks will be used toward the construction of a monument to be placed outside the Nassau County Veterans Services Agency building in East Meadow. Each tower of the monument will stand 26 bricks high and feature an engraved dedication to our veterans.
How easy is that, right? Get started right away and maybe you will be featured right here!
I machine pieced and hand quilted this quilt.
Superintendent Obed Tsheounyani, Sergeant Vusi Shongwe and Constable David Langa were released on bail of R5 000 each on Monday by the Protea Magistrate's Court.
I cannot say that One Acts altered the direction of my life. I did not go on to have a long and illustrious acting career; in fact, I have never been on stage again. But One Acts marked a change in me.
Like the hypocrite that I am, I have been known to point a moralistic finger at certain smokers, such as at women who smoke while pregnant, or at adults holding children while a lit cigarette dangles precariously from their lips.
Step 15. You are still holding the working yarn to the right of your needles. Bring the yarn backwards, behind your work, and around the tip of the right needle, as seen above, ending with the yarn between the two needles.
His mother had the frailty
Rather than being daunted, the family actually embrace the pirate's life. Soon enough they are navigating by the stars and having the time of their life. Back at the Clark's home, the pirates too are getting used to landlubbing ways.
Product Description:
VERITAS Enterprise Administrator Service Localized Package
I am usually more drawn to brunettes, but this blonde Aussie really can do no wrong, it seems. Been hard core crushing her for a bit now, and drooling uncontrollably over her extensive white wardrobe, and ridiculously leggy stems. What.A.Babe.
Continuing her lifelong dedication to shafting everyone of no further use to her, Merkel is worried that the FPD may not even clear the 5% ‘hurdle’ to be jumped if the Party is to be allocated seats in the Bundestag after the next election. Following the establishment of an SPD/CDU Coalition in the small state of Saarland, the Fuhrerin now plans a snap election. It will be the sort she prefers: one where the result has been sorted out in advance, in that she and the Social Democrats will rule together….with a far more muted Opposition. I call it Ostimocracy. Certainly, it is a mockery of democracy as you and I would understand it.
I started running a little over a year ago. My original goal was just to run a 5K distance (3.1 miles) without stopping. I have walked many of 5Ks in my life, but I could hardly run to the end of my block without going into heart failure! This was a huge goal for me. I started with the C25K program. But man, once I got to where I was supposed to run 8 minutes and then 20 minutes, I thought I was NEVER going to be able to do this. My 5K race day came, and I couldn’t do it. I couldn’t even run 8 minutes straight without having to stop. I ended up walking most of that race. I completed it faster than my previous 5Ks, but I didn’t reach my goal of running the entire thing. Then it was time to train for my next race. See Jane Run 1/2 Marathon was in June. Realizing that I was not going to be able to run that entire race, I decided I needed a training plan. That is where I ran into the 4 run 2 minute walk training plan. I loved it. As a matter of fact, I have loved it so much, it has almost become a crutch. I began to feel like I would never be able to run more than 4 minutes at a time. So in the last year, I have tested myself several times to prove to myself I can run a full mile. I can run more than 4 minutes. I can do this. I can do that. But I have YET to run a full 5K distance without stopping!
a few days later, he said
Recently, I’ve been following a kind of Korean variety show called Hello Baby. Hello baby is a variety show where an idol group pretend to be fathers or mothers of a children for 3 months. This program has now reached season 5. And the guest star for this season 5 is a group idol named MBLAQ.
While, to some of us, a change in epoch has taken place, one must remember the peculiar obsession of what befits the “modern times” or the twentieth ( now twenty first) century is not shared across the populace of India. This is especially true for the Dalits and other oppressed and marginalized communities and it is time one admits that the grappling with modernity which so permeates our popular discourse is, at the end of the day, primarily a higher caste phenomenon – which interestingly also makes it a minority phenomenon, the higher castes being a minority of the Indian population.
The grounds of the estate are as beckoning as what’s inside the buildings. Imagine 8,000 mostly-wooded acres along the French Broad River with gorgeous gardens and spectacular mountain views. It’s a great place for biking and walking with 15 miles of safe trails, and their winery offers tastings at no additional charge.
Flights are plentiful, and it’s easy to hop over to neighbouring Jamaica and Cuba.
The problem is not CCTV cameras themselves, but the people who abuse us all by operating them in a disproportionate manner. There is little observable evidence that they deter, but plenty that they oppress and reduce our sense of freedom as a result of their over-zealous application.
I sit down at a table
social formations or larger human institutions. Hence a global culture
“What is the meaning of this?” he said.
Just like with the punk and goth scenes, this process takes time. The people who make up these specific subcultures can spot an imposter like that, so you better do your homework. Taking baby steps, Steve Burns slowly transforms himself into John Forbes, an art student with a thing for black undershirts. Renting an apartment in the West Village, and making friends with his new neighbour, a playwright named Ted (Don Scardino), there's a new man on the scene and he's ready to cruise. Okay, maybe he's not quite ready to "cruise," but he's learning the ropes. Hanging out at infamous leather bars such as the Ramrod, the Anvil, and the Cockpit, Steve observes the crowd as they interact with one another.
I think when they asked for parent volunteers they assumed that the parents had been ice skating before and were capable of helping. I failed them. I have never been. I also resembled Bambi so times it by 51. There was a lot of crawling, rolling, and tangles limbs.
Pressure can
When one girl got pregnant at 14, she met with the elder, and the elder woman started casually talking to the parent, and dropping in hypothetical hints to ease the shock, such as, “say your daught got pregnant… how would you handle that?”
Notions: Trim, cording, sari fabric remnant from JoAnns - $25
Later, while thinking about the scene, it struck me how nobody seemed to care why this little human being was crying. None of them seemed to even think that there might have been a reason for his tears, that perhaps there were some real human emotions and needs behind it all. It seems to me the little boy was feeling afraid, insecure, confused, needing safety, reassurance, connection, some more time to make gradual steps into the unknown…
But Burger said there was little citizens could do to curb residential robbery.
The Land of Shinar (Babylonia) was the country to which Cain journeyed after he was banished from Eden, and all authority suggests that the first inhabitants of that country were black people, -- in other words, ancient people who had migrated from Africa in various stages, as confirmed by modern-day archaeogenetic evidence. There is no doubt in my mind that Cain married into this African family living in Asia, but I’m not going to discuss these aspects here. For those who are interested, you’re most welcome to surf along to my latest posting (PART 3) on the sister blog.
How Do You Get Paid In Project Pay Day
Is the main dish on the menu for today. You will be drinking lots and lots of water today. You will not eat much today, but after this first week, you will lose a significant amount of weight. Drinking a lot of water will help you stay hydrated and help you keep your skin in good condition. Also since tomorrow’s blog will include some work outs, you don’t need to worry much about the water weight you might put on today because you will lose it tomorrow.
John J. Macreedy: Well, I know this much. The rule of law has left here, and the guerrillas have taken over.
Well my friends are gone and my hair is grey
Let me introduce you to the first of my 2 little girls - Katie. She's first because she's my big girl, at a whole 4 1/2 years old. This is her, in a nutshell:
Cuts right through me
3. Potterish folk use a lot, and I mean A LOT, of stuff to do potterish things. Fetch me warm to the touch water; I need a smallish sponge; where's my work board ??? Now you might can see why I kept disappearing into the garden under the guise of 'helping Mum out .....'
One day, he and I were having a bit of a back-and-forth, calling each other a goo-gone, when suddenly my four year old whips out this little beauty.
Her systems were still garbled, patchy communications came intermittently. "C.I.C. this is Nike, do you copy?" she tried her comm, hoping that direct communications line with Orion wouldn't be a screwed as the rest of the Fleet wide bans. She couldn't very well do her job if she couldn't communicate to the Orion or her squadrons.
Bake for 20-25 minutes or until bronzed and beautiful. When they come out, mix together the sugar and water for the glaze and brush it over
This final descent (included in many of the challenges and a Tuesday night favourite) is a brilliant fast run down over grassy paths at an easy angle. I tried to use my considerable stride length down here to generate as much speed as possible but my aerobic limits were now all too obvious and I could feel time slipping away as I reached out for the finish. I didn’t look at my watch (too busy!) until I thrashed up to the gate by trhe cattle grid and I then peered at it to see…. 1:40.12. I was at the same time both disappointed to miss the ‘barrier’ by just 12 seconds and also pleased to have beaten my optimistic target by almost 5 mins. It’s a long way from Martin’s benchmark (no surprise there) but almost half an hour faster than my test time and in truth, very very encouraging – there’s life in the old fellhound yet!
To make the filling: In the bowl of a stand mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, beat the cream cheese on medium speed until smooth, about 30 seconds. Scrape down the sides of the bowl then add the sugar and vanilla, beating until smooth and creamy, about 1-2 minutes. Add the eggs, one at a time, beating just until incorporated and scraping down the sides of the bowl in between. Transfer 2 tablespoons of this batter to the 3/4 cup of caramel sauce and stir to incorporate. Pour the remaining cheesecake batter over the cooled crust and spread evenly.
· Superior organizational and analytical skills with keen attention to detail and quality.
3 cloves garlic, minced or pressed
c. Star America Aviation License is attached 33
On the evening of April 14, 1969 I was left alone in front of a television set. If we're being brutally honest that probably happened more often than my parents would have liked to admit, but on the other hand just look how I turned out. What I saw that particular night was so scary and inexplicable that it stayed with me…though it became so muddled as the years went by I began to wonder if I'd simply dreamed the whole thing. A supervillian or magician or mad scientist had kidnapped a quartet of rock musicians and turned them into robots. (Or had he built robot doubles to take their place while they remained in captivity? I wasn't sure.) I couldn't recall the rock group escaping and defeating their captor. I remembered something about the villain laughing as the show ended. Could the bad guy have won in the end? Surely that couldn't be right? For many years, I would remember bits of this at odd moments and wonder. Honestly, I would literally be lying awake in bed at night thinking what the hell was that?
I have to say that some of the cigars I sampled in Dubai were not smoking too well, sometimes they smoked very fast, sometimes they just were too dry. Perhaps the conditions in which they are kept are at times sub-optimal and my suggestion is probably to buy the more famous brands as the turnover would be quicker and therefore they are less likely to have not been stored properly...
5. Blow The Wind Southerly 2:49
Even though apple has been silent for about 3 day since the release of the SIII, the silence wont last for long and the insults will be flying soon and maybe even a law suit. Now I’m not saying any of this will happen I’m saying it could and when it dose it’s not gonna be pretty.
I don’t think I want to stop right now.
14. The Galileo 7-Are We Having Fun Yet? (Teen Sound)
And if once again we faced each other under the winter rain,
A lighthouse stands alone. Its greatness towers over tormenting waters and rocks of destructive power. Its beacon shines through black night to each oncoming vessel.
In the meantime, I leave you with this pic seen in the new issue of Lonny Magazine available now. If you've been reading this blog for any amount of time you know that I adore pink as an accent colour and that gold is my most favourite metal...combined with the fun & graphic black & white fabric...well it's just perfect. I'm in love with the entire look and may very well try to duplicate it in my future eating area....when I return from India. I'm particularly IN LOVE with the fabric used as tablecloth. Totally feminine, grown up, and chic....but still young and fun.
Amanpour: Diane how did the debate go?
What are your guys’ goal for travel this year? Anyone planning amazing trips, want to travel with someone in particular, have a food you want to eat somewhere or anything else? Thanks for reading, and I hope you all have a great week!
Time required:
So when the waters come
Paraffin Wax - I used Gulf wax available where canning supplies are sold
One of the chapters is inspired directly by this song. Its blend of sweetness, melancholy, and irreverent good humor is perfect.
63. The human race, to which so many of my readers belong, has been playing at children's games from the beginning, and will probably do it till the end, which is a nuisance for the few people who grow up. —G. K. Chesterton, The Napoleon of Notting Hill (1904)
2 t butter
Merely contemplating this definition is to touch true love. Just put this definition in your mind and it will begin the transformation.
- Bloomington Creative Glass Center: $800.00 for the Great Glass Pumpkin Patch, which features more than 250 hand-blown glass pumpkins.
I also used a Spellbinders Fleur De Lis die for the border and I stuck the ends of two borders together to make the rosette.
What is it about the number three in storytelling? There are traditional tales such as The Three Little Pigs, Three Billy Goats Gruff, Goldilocks and the Three Bears. Then there are the lesser-known tales: The Three Sillies, The Devil with the Three Golden Hairs, The Three Snake Leaves, and so many more.
“I-” I broke off mid-sentence – opening my mouth to speak had caused the pain in the right side of my face to come to bear, full force. “I deserved that.”
When the alarm went off this morning at 5:00, I thought aaw man I set my alarm and its Saturday. I laid there for a moment and my head cleared and I thought for a minute "is it Saturday?" Waaagh no it wasnt. Oh my gosh, of course my mind was actually saying "WTF". But I dont want to type that. Yes, I try to be a good person, but I slip.
My baby nephew also fell asleep whilst I was holding him, but not the first time. He didn't know me, and I guess I was nervous too, he was rather small and fragile, or at least he looked it. When it came to nappies he was a man's man. I did have the pleasure(?) of changing his nappie, and not only had he made a huge, orange poop, he peed on me. Not once, but twice. During the same nappie change.. I think I got the point, and got him dressed quickly. It was obviously a bit cold and he was suffering from bladder shrinkage. Or initiating me.
Cultivation
The Twelve Days of Christmas…which started December 13th!
I had completely forgotten that Brenna's boyfriend, Blake Boles, also has a travel blog! I was loving all of Brenna's photo's and stories of their adventures but her blog was lacking in photos of my girl :). However, Blake's blog has several sweet photos of her which made for a very happy morning for me.
12. Turn It Down (Chapman, Chinn) - 3:34
Me: What’s the difference between the iphone, an android and a Blackberry? I already have a Blackberry but, it might be time to change.
The kids really did do a great job and I love to see the Weasels perform. The only real problem I have with these events is having to sit through watching 275 other parents children sing in order to see mine. The one benefit though is that with a family of our size, 1/2 the performances (the better 1/2, of course) feature a Weasel.
Great. She is about to make an announcement. Here it is. “In a few minutes we will begin boarding flight V200 to Sydney Australia. We will start with Upperclass passengers first.” Yes, that’s me. Upperclass gets to board first. Yes. Wait, she is still talking. ”At this time, we would like to welcome those passengers with young children or those who may need a little more time to board.” What? I though upperclass boarded first. You mean children and old people have more rights then “Upperclass.” Wait a minute, Syd, don’t let this go to your head. It is just a seat on a plane. Yep, a seat in “Virgin Atlantic Upperclass”.
Metalheads are easily impressed. The hook of Heavy Metal music on the surface level is the same spectacle that captures the attention of fans of other pop music, i.e. what the artist is wearing in their photo-shoot, what big statement they made in the press, how catchy the first melody of the first song on the record is, so on. On that level, how hard, fast and/or technical a metal band plays serves the same purpose as the new outfit worn by Lady Gaga. Different language, same argumentation.
Here's the style guideline for "Session Beer," under Hybrid/Mixed Beer Styles.
dedicated to Country Gourmet Home. Our
The Top Dog, the Big Cheese, the Head Honcho
Well hello there…
They remain diligent to avoid filtering.
Im feeling great. And I know I can do it.
In one corner, wrapped in the Stars and Stripes, we have Bill Miller, the trucking tycoon, who has bold £11.2 million, and at first demanded written confirmation from the SPL and SFA that Rangers would face no more sanctions other than the 10-point penalty already imposed. His demand was followed by the SFA Judicial Panel imposing fines totalling £160,000 on Rangers, and a 12-month embargo on registering players other than under 18’s.
It’s crazy thinking. Yes we can vote to cut the debt! Read the following crazy reasoning:
These gems were culled from only a month’s worth of salacious solicitations. We’ve captured some 1400 of them so far.
I was inspired by a few people on wordpress who are like libraries, each in their own way:
This year is my 20 year reunion for my school crew and my final year at school. That means I have been rowing 22 years. It's been 17 years of senior team selections. In the my 17th year I have had some good results and plan on more in the future but I have also gone swimming twice. Crashed twice. Flipped once. Blown up on the ergo a few times and even the test this week I thought I was right and sort of hit the wall with 600 to go. Funny that I feel as good as I ever have and am feeling great about the improvements ahead.
In a soft and matter of fact voice my father said to me “you are going into the White man’s land. Please remember to follow his rules, stay out of trouble and be safe.”
Can you feel this imagery? How we all want our souls to be restored.
Invitations can be expensive, so why not yours? Choose your own images and text, you can call even more personal and create a theme that can be completed in all aspects of your wedding, including place cards, programs, and favor tags. Using illustrations, invitations, or may reflect the mood you hope to do, whether it be traditional, semi-formal, informal or a country.If you are planning a Christmas wedding, decorate your invitations with colored poinsettias or festive wreaths and trees. Valentine's Day ceremony, choose funny pictures cupid, hearts entwined, or a bouquet of red roses.Are you plan a theme winter wonderland? Hats decorated with sparkling snowflakes and snowmen cartoons. If you have a destination wedding, choose the images to view the location, such as palm trees, sunsets, mountains.Of or course, if you are looking for something more traditional, you can design invitations using the bride and groom pictures, braided rings, birds, or flowers.
Still, the general feeling is very calm and not agressive.We managed to meet up with wifey's colleagues and we walked together from McD to Nando's to wait for "further instructions". According to one of the collegues, when the time came, there would be someone who would tell us when to start moving to Dataran Merdeka. We saw Selangor Assembly speaker Datuk Teng Chang Khim ariving with an entourage.
Micheletto stumbles to della Rovere’s palace, where the cardinal asks for torture details. Micheletto says they tortured him for 24 hours straight, but he revealed nothing. Just as he predicted, della Rovere removes Micheletto’s shirt and takes in the wounds, murmuring that they beat Jesus the same way. He asks Micheletto if it’s true that Orsini accidentally poisoned himself. Micheletto asks who would have profited from his death. “Certainly not Cardinal Orsini,” says della Rovere. Heh. Actually, it turns out that Alexander would profit the most from Orsini’s demise, since Orsini’s properties would go to him, as pope. Della Rovere says he’s not into the poisoning method. Micheletto says he’s not fond of it either, that his talents are in discretion, and silence. He says he hates Borgia, and then out of nowhere, della Rovere squeezes lemon juice over Micheletto’s bloodied back. Man, what a dick! “I can trust these wounds of yours,” della Douchebag murmurs. With supreme effort, Micheletto manages not to start screaming in pain. Apparently this wins della D over and he tells Micheletto that he wants to assemble cardinals who feel the same way about Borgia as Micheletto does, and it needs to be done in absolute secrecy.
These little suits belonged to me and my brother. They were purchased in Portugal before we moved to the States and I thought they deserved a place of honor in the nursery. I love the touch of blue it adds to the room.
When he came in contact with the toe of my shoe he jerked back.
“I don’t care,” he said savagely. “Where would you go?”
I realize the Twilight craze took place a few years ago when the first movie was released. This issue is probably "old hat" now -- I certainly wouldn't know as I don't keep up with fads and fashions. However, I believe that something like this has lasting effects on the lives of young people. Adoring girls have probably lost their passion over this vampire creep... but they can only seek greater thrills and are wandering more deeply into spiritual darkness.
Cons: Visually there is no mistaking this game for Call of Duty, but even so for a free-to-play game the graphics are satisfactory.
If you are just tuning in... my life is ridiculous. #welcome
Sadness.
CinemaLive’s CEO, Peter Skillman, said of the release: ‘I’m delighted to begin our relationship with Park Circus by bringing this remarkable piece of history to the Australian public, for one very special day leading up to the excitement of the Diamond Jubilee Celebrations."
The past six months have not been the easiest in my life. I’m thankful for that, because I am learning a lot about myself and about others, and that is making me a better person. We have all experienced this type of learning process, and we know it isn’t easy, and there are times when we want to throw in the towel and give up, because it’s not worth it being so miserable.
Static I can't turn off frequents, with words,
The Monogamy Illusion: I don’t have any formal expertise on the topic though. Just a ton of opinions. Though a very similar idea has already be explored by David Barash and Judith Eve Lipton in their classic, The Myth of Monogamy.
Allison
In this article the names of four famous musicians who either had perfect pitch or possibly had it, Beethoven, Ella Fitzgerald, Mozart and Jimi Hendrix are mentioned. The author Ed Douglas does not mention that two of these musicians also experienced coloured music synaesthesia (drug use could have been the cause of Hendrix’s colours). We do not know if Mozart had synaesthesia (my intuition tells me he did), but there has been much speculation over the years that Mozart might have had a range of different neurological peculiarities or disorders. Douglas mentions that Hendrix and Mozart both had an extraordinary savant-like memory for music. Hendrix, Mozart and possibly also Beethoven were left-handed.
Let he who is without sin, cast the first stone----well, it went something like that---and hey, you, stop chucking those rocks---we know what you've done.
Release Date: January 31, 2012
I treated myself to a new Nora Robert's book today, "The Last Boyfriend". It is the second book in The Inn Boonsboro trilogy.
4. Dark Chocolate Ganache Insert
In fact, here you can see the meeting prep corner of my office.
But one comment on media coverage of the case. In Sunday’s New York Times, Mark Viera (whose sports reporting I enjoy) wrote the following, regarding the record of Penn State football coach Joe Paterno: “A grand jury said that when Mr. Paterno learned of one allegation of abuse in 2002, he immediately reported it to Mr. Curley. The grand jury did not implicate Mr. Paterno in any wrongdoing, though it was unclear if he ever followed up on his initial conversation with Mr. Curley or tried to alert the authorities himself.
Schumer is asking the New York State Restaurant Association (NYSRA) to encourage member restaurants to offer locally-brewed beer on their menu. In addition to getting more beers into restaurants close to where it is brewed, Schumer will be pushing the New York City members of the NYSRA to consider offering beers brewed across Upstate New York and Long Island. While some beers like Genesee and Saranac have gained popularity in the downstate market, Schumer and New York brewers believe this market is vastly underutilized and represents the chance to dramatically grow craft brewing across the state.
Next on my "I want" list...a new camera.
Me: Dulce, tell me what is your connection to zebras?
Things like vacuuming the stairs while he plays in the parlor with the tube attachment to the vacuum cleaner.
Super Junior’s Leeteuk said what he wants to do as a newly-married groom.
11:55: Towler suggests that, as in the row over tamiflu over-supply, a way of fighting prohibition is by members of the public getting "noisy on the internet", and "complaining and making a fuss". He refers to the recent Nick Hogan case as an example of the effectiveness of individual action.
Following two meetings of a working group comprising “intellectual property and internet law experts” a policy document has now issued for public comment. The attached policy document sets out a proposed approach for dealing with allegations of repeat copyright infringement in the digital environment.
A few challenges:
Thanks for stopping by... hope you have a purr-fect day!
of a Saturn V
*Contest runs from Friday to Thursday. All final entreis must be completed by midnight CST. The winner will be posted the following day and have 5 days to claim your prize or Lil' Tulip's reserves the right to choose a new winner. Please contact us at www.liltulips.com/crm.asp?action=contactus to redeem.
"Well its Monday and that means ONE THING...the avengers assemble in four short days! I was lucky enough to see the flick before it hits the big screen (I know, I Know), so here are MY thoughts on the avengers. Honestly, I don't even want to do a review bc it was just THAT good...nothing I say will justify the greatness of this flick...it's a must see, and joss whedon NAILED this one folks."
The part in bold in the above paragraph is important as yesterday North Carolina joined with 30 other states that have voted to add an amendment to their constitution banning same-sex marriage in their state.
The animals agreed that this made sense. There was no reason a pineapple should challenge a hare unless it had a clever plan of some sort. So the animals, wanting to back a winner, all cheered for the pineapple.
Unpro's Sidebar re: "This American Life"
Brew Dog Punk IPA and Maui Big Swell
1 alchemical
Sheer Joy.
God bless you Mar as you dive into the that great big ocean in the sky. You'll be missed.
Q
Harton 1-49
1-2 teaspoon brandy
For some reason today (perhaps it was Brigid asking if I've run in them, but really, who knows), I decided to go for a short run around the neighborhood. I've been training with only 2-3 runs a week and have missed my daily 2-3 miles since I had dropped my dailies over the winter (dont know why... I missed them and yet couldnt get my butt out of bed in the early a.m. to go). As I put on my running clothes, I decided to forgo my sneakers (it's been raining and they are new... but really that's just an excuse I think) and keep the Vibrams (which I've worn all morning to clean in).
FB: Oh! It's that theeng that puts water into the air.
Recently I read the book, Trail of Immortality, by Gabriel Ezutah. In the book he tells of his dream travels with his spiritual teacher. He describes many different lifetimes and the lessons he learned from each incarnation. At one point he visits a gallery of spiritual art works and describes a picture there. He explained how there was a volcano in the middle of a bright blue ocean. The title on the picture was Glimpse of God. Later he tells of visiting this place and seeing the volcano.
How is that OK? Where are the blustering moral police, spitting bile and hot rancid breath, when that outrage is going on.
If cranial electrotherapy stimulation was having a beneficial impact on my ability to sleep (an iffy proposition to begin with given the paucity of scientific evidence supporting its efficacy), it no longer seems to be working now.
Words from a Catholic
But I did anyway
º “Work With Us, Not Against Us.”
In Moms (2004), the duo paints reproductions of what looks like low-end yearbook photos or Wal-mart studio shots. It is easy to see through their tender, soft rendering that Davis and Langlois love their mothers, but what makes the portraits more charming is that their love is slightly delinquent. Moving from Moms to Pyre (2004), a large painting of a fuzzy blaze recalling Gerhard Ritcher, I imagine Davis and Langlois mischievously acquiescing to take out the trash only to later spray it with accelerant, setting a pagan bonfire in their front yard. Pyre is a mysterious fire, and taken out of the fabric of the show as a whole, could easily recall the burning bush. This, however, is definitely an American flame, akin to Ed Ruscha’s Various Small Fires (1964), full of colloquial mayhem worthy of the film Gumo.
Here's to a successful and fulfilling learning journey this year!
Radio Panik in Brussels continues to amaze.
I had been living alone before you came. And I have been living alone since you left. And trust me; one doesn’t need to be a nuclear scientist to spot the difference between the two.
SendaFlyingCard: Debrah T
Oh what a great day. We started off the day by getting the kids ready for a "surprise". The surprise involved something cold and required several layers to be warm throughout. So we spent probably 20 solid minutes getting the kids in jackets, coats, hats, and mittens. They were fairly cooperative this morning though, which isn't always the case, but was sure a blessing that started our morning off right. Then we set off with a few blankets in hand for a ride on the "Polar Express". Now our children are huge train lovers. We live two blocks south of the train depot and you can see one of the main tracks from the corner nearest our house and the boys have spent a lot of time in warmer weather sitting at the corner watching the train move back and forth. This particular train is just for paying passenger rides - like a tour type thing. I looked into it when we first moved back here to my home town and with four children it's just cost prohibitive for us. So when I heard that our local library was doing a Polar Express program ON the train this month I called up the library asap and got on the waiting list. In the end we were blessed that we were able to get on. So we walked to the tracks because with four kiddos walking was probably about equal in time to loading up the kids, driving there, parking, unloading the kids etc. And frankly it was a lot simpler to walk out the front door and direct the kids to keep walking.
Change to bib color
and another cover band
In 1965 on July 29th we ran the Beatles' film "Help!" concurrently with the World Premiere run at the London Pavilion. They started the film in the evening, so we showed the first ever public screening of the film in the world! I made sure I made up the program that morning, screen the first performance entirely and the watch the next performance from the auditorium before the World Premiere performance that evening! The week prior we had a live show with Cliff Richard, and all the staff had their picture taken with him in the circle foyer. Afterwards I walked down the stairs to the main foyer with Cliff in full view of a huge banner of the following Thursday's program of "Help!" and he expressed great enthusiasm in seeing the film.
Common Loon 1
he who keeps you will not slumber.
Wednesday morning - I've tried to suppress my Road Rage by biting down really hard on my finger every time I feel frustrated. I hate that every time I drive past my ex girlfriends old netball court it's so early morning empty, always sodden with rain and lots and clods of rubbish generally swirl around in the breeze. It's a little bit strange to see it so dilapidated, like seeing your childhood home have a garden covered in weeds, or seeing a favourite beloved auntie without teeth, but with stubble, so you have to suffer a rash inducing kiss. There's a red light that I always get stuck at, and today it's almost broken down, so I'm stuck there, alone, with my thoughts and a staticy radio hissing in my brain. For some reason at work, I've acquired an ironic girlfriend. I should explain - I engaged with this girl what I thought was a series of ironic and sardonic flirtations on the routines of work. I didn't know that they don't do sardonic in Margate. Now she sends me txt msgs about the alienation and despair that marriages where 1ne partner can't wash socks can bring. So I don't know if that means were in some sort of tense future relationship, if she's going to pitch up on my lawn with a bag full of stuff but it means...something? Maybe - I have a crush on a girl who works at an appallingly named hair salon, but I don't think that means anything at all. Irony is a dangerous thing. I don't know why everything got so complex - mind you, I had a relationship with Debbie back in Scotland which was a consistent battle between the emotional maturity of an 11even year old and a 12elve year old. Apparently if you can't understand the emotional complexity of an Orange Juice record, or preferred a Twix to a Galaxy Truffle, you aren't worth knowing. I preferred Sinitta. I had no hope. So I just sat swinging my legs on the circular brick wall that was my relationship bachelor pad trying to decipher the riddle that was Cosmopolitan approved relationship chat. By the time I get out of my car, my finger has chewed through and is covered in bite marks. I suspect that I need to acquire a new anger halting habit...maybe some mellow music. I hear some of Sinittas B-sides are particularly melancholy...
Still, I can't wait til January 2nd.
I beseech you therefore, brethren, by the mercies of God, that ye present your bodies a living sacrifice, holy, acceptable unto God, which is your reasonable service. And be not conformed to this world: but be ye transformed by the renewing of your mind, that ye may prove what is that good, and acceptable, and perfect, will of God.
“The NDFP is always willing to meet his special representatives on the special track so that the conditions of peace negotiations are greatly improved and efforts are accelerated to address the roots of the armed conflict and lay the ground for a just and lasting peace.”
Card # 230: Kurt Suzuki, 2011 Bowman Green 230, Oakland A's (230/450)
with wondrous clouds,
The chart works in conjunction with a map.I’ll cover more on maps later on but for now just remember the map.
When we finally got home at about 3:40, I took a quick shower to get rid of the concert grime, then collapsed in bed. I slept until past 3:00 this afternoon, and I still feel tired! But it was a very good time had by all last night. :-)
–you don’t like movement while fighting, or fast-twitch
This weeks has been a little mixed up, but I’m trying to still stay on track. I mentioned earlier in the week that I swapped my rest day to Saturday, and worked out on Sunday instead. I ran 3 miles Monday, and really felt awesome. Tuesday, I didn’t work out because my schedule was a little different, and I had my last ever Symphonic Band concert that night. I had dinner and ice cream with my family, so my food intake this week has not been as good as last week. I ran 2 miles yesterday in about 24 minutes, and didn’t feel quite as good as I did on Monday.
3 Bowker, D. & Stuart, S. (2005) Ab initio language teaching in Scottish universities, Subject Centre for Languages Linguistics and Area Studies
Life is uncertain (more about that at another time) but love is eternal.
Liebster Blog Award. The award is given to a blog with less than 200 followers that deserves a little more recognition. Here are the rules:
"I was wondering if you might like to run with me and my three friends. It might be dangerous though, you might get the odd nip on the heels!"
F O C U S I N G
"It was nothing. Just some stupid prank that got out of hand." She looked away, her expression guilt-ridden.
The process evolved to a point where the telemarketers would begin sending over data files rather than faxing the data. I worked with the IT department to design an efficient flow which enabled our system to take these data files and match up with our own data to automatically assign clusters to calls to specific ad placements. This was pretty cool in an era when we didn't even have email in our company, and if a fax machine broke down you were well and truly screwed. Imagine 3 or 4 people waiting their turn to fax out a stack. I've seen it and lived it.
It is clear from looking at multiple Bible dictionaries that Easter is a counterfeit of the Pesach (Passover).
A stunning and highly complex painting composed of separate oak panels, The Mystic Lamb of 1432 by Hubert and Jan van Eyck, known as the Ghent Altarpiece, recently underwent much-needed emergency conservation within the Villa Chapel.
I’m overwhelmed. I feel like I want to escape these bad feelings and thoughts.
This is why I run.
I'm fortunate to have a VitaMix to blend it all up in, but you can just as easily use an immersion blender. If you use your blender or food processor, blend it in batches, and add extra liquid if you hear the engine straining.
Today is our last day in BA. We have a red eye flight at 9pm. I am both excited to come home to the beach and sad that our trip is ending. There are many things I am going to miss about this place. To start..the soccer culture. There is always at least three games on TV, accompanied by a announcer with a voice with so much passion and intensity you might think every game is a championship. Matt and I made it to five River games and there is nothing else like them. The dining culture...Eating out is a big part of the culture here and no matter what night of the week there is lines pouring down the street from your favorite grubbery. Cheap red wine...My wallet and I will miss it dearly, my liver will not. The city life...There is always something fun to do or unique to try and always someone who is equally interested in doing and trying with you. Spanish... For all its hardships learning a new language has by far been the most rewarding part of this trip. The mindset of fellow expatriates...Meeting a fellow expat is always a very enjoyable experience. There is no hostility or awkwardness, only a genuine interest in getting to know the other person and sharing experiences, contacts and advice. Lack of communication...Relying on cell phones with only basic features and a low credit line that gets lower with each call, sometimes you actually have to follow through with plans and not cancel the last minute with fear that you can't get ahold of the person. It honestly makes life easier and more dependable people.
Max von Sydow, Extremely Loud & Incredibly Close
I'm reading now:
What can I say...I love them. It wasn't long ago that I didn't own a single one. Then over the last couple of years, I have accumulated several....11 to be exact. Not many to some...a lot to others. I'm pretty happy with the ones I have. Some good variety, I think. I definitely have my favorites. My all time favorite is the Fiskars Threading Water border punch. It was my very first border punch purchase and I have never regretted it. But it did start my frenzy to buy more...
Goede Doel België NL
They were attacked by Abbassiya residents angry at the protesters, according to the official Mena news agency.
Frankly, I can't make any sense of these rankings. They're not based on the number of hits, because in 2011 I had nearly double the number than in 2010, yet my position in the top 100 declined throughout the year. No doubt history will repeat itself and ReARM will slide down the charts again during the course of this year. If you want to follow my position, it's given on the badge at the bottom of the column on the right, and it changes monthly. To see the whole top 100 blogs, click here or on that badge. Some of them are worth your time; there's a couple I don't like, but I'm not saying which.
-Chocolate Chip
Thanksgiving with the family was wonderful, of course. Skip met a horse for the first time, and he also met a few more of his favorite animal: dogs.
Hurriedly, quickly, we gave them our blessing,
ECRE and ELENA’s new research report offers qualitative legal research on the current practice surrounding Rule 39 interim measures in the field of asylum and expulsion. It examines the experiences of lawyers in submitting Rule 39 requests and where appropriate, the European Court of Human Rights’ response and the compliance of Member States of the Council of Europe to these measures. Where appropriate, recommendations have been made to the organs of the Council of Europe, legal representatives and to Member States to improve the functioning of this essential legal tool and to ensure access to effective legal remedies within State Parties themselves.
Three d100 tables; 'A' is primarily adjectives, 'B' is nouns, and 'C' is geographic features or settlement types. So you could roll A+B, A+C, A+B+C, whatever. Be prepared to add plurals and possessives where appropriate. Nonsensical or redundant results are of course possible ('Bent Bend').
I gotta admit that i am just not a fan of purple, but i must say that stretching my limits seems to be quite good for me as i love how this image turned out in purple.
While I do miss my friends from there, I now feel like I have some really good friends here. People who I not only want to keep as my friends for years to come, but also whom I wish I had been able to have met sooner. People who share my new, altered view of the world; people who understand how awful & amazing all at the same time it is to live here and make me laugh like mad about it; people who...I am beginning to feel settled with. And the thing is that I would miss them terribly in a way that I didn't have to miss my Derby friends, because then I was departing on an unknown adventure, and the excitement of that offset those feelings, whereas a return to Derby feels like a trip into the known, and not much of an adventure at all.
When they should always be the first person on their to do list,
While there, my two scepter-like arms,
Once
And he did so by having a huge press conference and.....what? Oh, he released an email in the middle of the night where he doesn't so much as say Mittsy's the best man for the job, but reiterates how different he and Mittsy are, and how, "Well, he's all we've got, so.....Hey you! Lady! Stop with the birth control already."
posted my button
ANGELA: I was really from a different school. I was brought up differently – very strict. But I wanted to be, you know supportive because once it’s done – you can’t undo it.
Rabb and Hammon were inspired by the success of their childhood friend, Jimi Hendrix. They added Glenn Thomas on guitar and, on the horns, were Jim Coile and Tim McFarland.
Yes, yes there are movies on the Elevated Acre and free ferries to and from Governor's Island, but so much of the diverse charm of New York, the independent shops and other-worldly eateries are missing down below Chambers. (I am sure many of you will disagree, please do! And send me advice for where to go on my Trinity Church date!)
Combine the butter, sugar, cocoa, and salt in a medium heatproof bowl and place in the microwave, cooking in 30 second increments as not to over cook. Stir after each 30 seconds. Cook until butter is melted, and ingredients are well combined--it looks fairly gritty at this point, but it smooths out once the eggs and flour are added. If you don't have a microwave, a double boiler will work just the same.
I’m still debating whether I should buy a new eReading device. The Kobo Vox is tempting, but it runs an older version of Android and can’t even run HD video. What I do know is that for now, I really really miss my Kobo.
Singing about our love for God in church, while the rest of the week we exploit the less fortunate, or stand idly by while others do, is not merely inconsistent. It’s repulsive to God.
I know the whole traditional vs. self-publishing thing is a hot button right now. There are people on both sides who are completely convinced that choosing one path over the other may equate to writer-cide. (Erm, read: death of your writing career by way of foolhardy decision making.) When one does well in traditional, THAT is the path you should take... when a bestseller comes from the independent side, THAT is the path you should choose.
What gorgeous makes we had last week - the DT are finding is so hard to choose their favourites! But keep them coming because we love to see them! Our featured entrant this week is by...
I only have three left of the original pieces.
(Politico) — Attorney General Eric Holder used Martin Luther King Jr.’s legacy on the anniversary of the civil rights leader’s birthday Monday to emphasize the Obama administration’s dedication to protecting the American people from discriminatory voting practices.
The next March, Congress appropriated $15,000 for a fog signal at Point Montara, to be positioned at the end of a rocky bluff 70 feet above the ocean. Earlier signals had been installed to the south at Ano Nuevo, and to the north at Yerba Buena Island. Operational March 1, 1875, the signal was a 12-inch steam whistle whose five-second blast could be heard up to 15 miles away. The whistle didn't come cheap--it took betwen 150,000 and 200,000 pounds of coal to fuel it every year, depending on the number of foggy days.
Back in 2006 I planned a family reunion for my Dad's 70th birthday. We ended up with a houseful of family over a two day stretch. It was a wonderful time, seeing cousins I hadn't seen for years. Seeing their children. Listening to the aunts and uncles catch up with each other. My folks and siblings stayed here with us while the rest of the relatives stayed in Blackstone, which is only about 15 minutes from here. While Mom was here, I got her to write down her rice pudding recipes (there's two and I made the stove top one today) and her Peach upside-down cake recipe. I later laminated those so I will always have them, in her writing, and can pass them on to my daughter one day.
Self-generating and strong and gentle-
Brands seem to be adhering to the "next big thing” concept with their ads; so much so as I want to label these kind of spots as “pop commercials.” These are the commercials that have been pumped out with the main purpose being to generate a shock value or to be the Diddy of advertising. Companies want their spots to be the talk of the town for a day, a week, or a month…Cough Rebecca Black Cough. But sometimes that doesn’t happen because they lack depth. Commercials that have some depth to them will be the ones you will always remember, the ones you save on your YouTube account or the ones you and all your friends talk about.
We'll be using this diet to help treat ADHD, but I don't think this diet would hurt anyone. It's really just cutting out artificial flavors, colors, additives, and preservatives. Think back a couple generations when store shelves weren't inundated with all this highly processed food. Today everything contains neon colors, artificial flavors, and man made preservatives. Cereal with artificial preservatives, crazy colors and fake flavors, yogurt with artificial flavors, colors, and sprinkles, bread made from flour that has had all the nutrition bleached out of it are in everyone's home. Now think about how many kids get diagnosed with ADD/ADHD and autism (just to name a couple) now as opposed to a couple generations ago. Now, I'm not saying that artificial ingredients in food is solely to blame for this, but it does make one think, doesn't it? It just seems to me that there could be a correlation between the two and if you can afford it, it may help to eliminate some of these artificial ingredients in favor of more natural, organic ones. And taking the junk out of your diet won't do any harm, so it doesn't hurt to try. (Although I admit, if it weren't for my son with ADHD, I probably wouldn't give it a second thought and I'd feed my kids Fruit Loops, waffles with fake maple-flavored syrup, and Kool-Aid for breakfast.)
So who owns the loan? The investor lenders. Who owns the note? Who cares, it was worth less when they started; but if anyone owns it it is most probably the originating “lender” ABC Lending. Who owns the mortgage? There is no mortgage. The mortgage agreement was written and executed by the borrower securing terms of payment that were neither disclosed nor real.
that there is a pile of cat vomit laying there.
one cup of powered milk
looking at it here, I think I may work it
- Lazy afternoons
I’m having fun, don’t put me down
and wishing to be stopped
In the end, I’m a firm believer in listening to your instincts. Storytelling is a gift. The instinct on how to tell those stories is ingrained into those of us who enjoy writing. Learn to listen to that inner voice. Don’t let others tell you aren’t capable of writing a story or that you’ll never get published. Those are comments we should never listen to.
It does not make any sense to spend all that time and effort to find and hire the best people, if the organization is not willing to listen to them and ignore their input. Start now and see how the process of success unfolds.
Paper and pen used to be her avid companions. Rhyme and parallelism, her guiding stars. She used to write in the old-fashioned manner, with her lips pursed and her forehead partly convoluted. Her palms perspiring, she writhed along her cursive handwriting, full of strikethroughs and alterations. Her thoughts, gapped.
your love more profoundly and truly.
“But what about your thesis,” replied MV, “you said the data supported
The Man asked me how I should view this as a Buddhist, reminding me of a story we had been discussing a while ago about how someone who is free from attachment would view their coat being stolen out of their car. They would be thankful that someone who obviously needed the coat had a coat.
This change was the rapid shifting of the sources of immigration from Western to Eastern and Southern Europe. A line drawn across the continent of Europe from northeast to southwest, separating the Scandinavian Peninsula, the British Isles, Germany, and France from Russia, Austria-Hungary, Italy, and Turkey, separates countries not only of distinct races but also of distinct civilizations. It separates Protestant Europe from Catholic Europe; it separates countries of representative institutions and popular government from absolute monarchies; it separates lands where education is universal from lands where illiteracy predominates; it separates manufacturing countries, progressive agriculture, and skilled labor from primitive hand industries, backward agriculture, and unskilled labor; it separates an educated, thrifty peasantry from a peasantry scarcely a single generation removed from serfdom; it separtes Teutonic races from Latin, Slav, Semitic, and, Mongolian races. (1)
Then another with her hands and shoulders shrugging:
Other times I get responses that are vague such as “get in better shape” or “get faster” which of course need some delving into. These general goals don’t provide much direction. After all, if you improve by 1 second in a 5k you are faster right? If you can run 1 minute longer than you ever have before you are in better shape. But is that what is really wanted? Doubtful.
The impending new Building Code is to be welcomed, having been developed in collaboration with key stakeholders. There needs to be a solid commitment by all parties to establishing proper enforcement of those critical standards. The Building Code will cover important areas such as earthquake and fire hazards as well as other quality issues.
So, I have a plan that my husband does not yet know about. Here is my plan:
And with that, I spent the next weeks in a constant stream of hobbling in and out of my accordion, writing and sending songs, revising others, pitching new ones. Every time I played, the baby would kick like crazy inside, putting me in a constant state of burping. Play, kick, burp, play, kick, burp. In the end, Mr. Allen asked me to cover the French classic "Parlez Moi d'Amour". Three versions later, I got the email at midnight.....my piano and accordion version is in the final cut featured under the romantic scenes.
Now, using the center back seam of the OUTER Skirt as reference, move the center back seam of the INNER skirt to the left. How far you move it over depends entirely on your taste and your fabric. I thought I was going to move mine all the way over to the left side pin, but I ultimately moved it to only half way between the center back and the left side:
‘However, we think that statutory oversight of the reformed regulator is desirable. Otherwise major publishers could opt out of its regulation. Statutory oversight of the regulator would give it more authority over the industry and give the public greater confidence in it.’
"Like I said..." I groaned, rubbing my temples. "We knew there was something in our attic, but we didn't know what..."
I saw an alcove nearby that had a water cooler, so Rob and I got our drinks there. Recessed just behind the fountain were what used to be called the “bathrooms,” but were now some exotic locale known as a “restroom.” Gone were the signs indicating which door was for men and which was for women. Now, they were only accepting “ladies” and “gentlemen.” I wasn’t sure I had the proper level of refinement to wash my hands in such splendor, so I just wiped them on my pants.
The sun shines and the flowers bloom!
She looks into your eyes,
1. Preheat the oven to 200°C (400°F)
Also extolling the timeless beauty of mother nature.
However, a new interview with fantasy author Thomas A Knight is burning up the cyberwaves, which is kind of nice. One of the nice things about my career is that I have been all over the place, a Forest Gump of game design, so I never know what the questions are going to be.
My outrage is somewhat tempered by some of Grenell’s tweets, which portray him as a bit of an asshole: “Hillary is starting to look like Madeleine Albright,” “Michelle Obama working out and sweating on the East Room carpet,” and asking if Callista Gingrich’s hair “snaps on” (Okay. That one could be a little bit funny.)
1 small yogurt, vanilla flavor
“On a final note,” continues Lane, “it’s going to be the best Summer album released in Winter.”
Leeches: The application of leeches or other blood-suckers can repair damage from infection or poison, at a rate of +1 points healed per day.
Prize is TEN DOLLARS gifted from ANY digi site of WINNER'S CHOICE. Simply upload your card (using AnjisAntics Images) to the YOUR WORK page or email a pic of it to me....THAT SIMPLE
We’ve all got them, those foods that we wake up craving, those foods we daydream about, those foods that make us salivate at the thought of them. Most people’s lists include chocolate, chips, pasta, cheese, bread and the like. My recent food lusting has taken a strange twist. I. Crave. Tofu! All day, everyday, I want it. Don’t know where it came from, don’t know what it will take to tame the hungry tofu beast, but she’s there.
has taken on a certain reverence. But I still struggle to feel
Min 3: “Oh, wait, it’s Monday. Okay, that is also a low-views day – so is Tuesday and Wednesday and hold on…”
“Most of us,” he said, “Think our Call is supposed to be big and flashy and long-suffering, but that is not the case.”
received, or to performed Covenant as if they had been Countrymen and not taken in war.”
My theme – I have selected a word for each day and will present to you blogger buddies who fit that description, along with movies, music, etc. My theme is to give back, highlight some awesome bloggers, and have fun in the process.
* Tests complex statistical routines using macros, vendor software, and software written by self and others
In life one thing happens after another. In a drama, one thing happens because of another. So how’s this all slot in? Somehow whatever happens with the Steves leads to Shatner.
They say the first 100 songs don’t count. Well, I’m way past 100 and I know now why they say that. It’s not that the songs I wrote 5 years ago are not good. I still think some of them are very good. But I learned over time to recreate the good stuff, and that you can’t build a whole song around one good line or a compelling melody. The whole thing needs to be outstanding.
-1 box sifted confectioner's sugar
which is something of a term of art. Going on the record is clearly conducting litigation but drafting a letter for the client to sign is not. The distinction becomes more blurred if the lawyer drafts the pleading but the client signs in person.
Father today we seek your discernment we seek your wisdom. Show us anything in us that we need to tear down show us the deepest things in our hearts that are stealing our intimacy with you. Father we praise you for your Mercy and Grace we come boldly to your throne in our time of need and ask you to grow us today in our life with you . In Jesus Name.
All is fair in love and war.
“It's not that you have to be an expert in botany to know how to identify a plant, its just that understanding some basic botany, such as leaf and flower structures, types of roots and fruits and the characteristics of major botanical families really helps you when it comes to identifying plants.
No actions on the part of our military can cause these enemies to be any more or any less cruel and vicious than they already are. They are brought up from the womb, to hate and make violence against all whom they consider to be infidels or who are somehow deemed in their warped psyches, to be unfit or unworthy.
"Mama, we're going to eat the frog's legs AND tongue. But mama, how do we NOT eat their germs?"
My goal for this blog isn’t just to keep me on track and brag when I hit my goal weight (fair warning I will do this) but I would like to share the recipes and hints and tricks that I will be doing along the way.
you can shake your head and criticize us right now.
Birds chirped. A gentle breeze blew. Across the street, neighbors focused on their yard work and the latest neighborhood gossip.
Then Mr. Santorum does not like contraception and any law that allows same-sex marriage, and he talks about having a smaller government. Yet he is all for laws like the patriot act and drug testing unemployed people. Those laws right there require more government. I guess people like Mr. Santorum like smaller government when others need government, and he wants larger government when he wants to pass moral laws. He would like less laws for Wall Street , yet he is willing to pass more moral laws to control Americans.
When OWS emerged in Oakland, youth, the Black and Brown community and the most radical elements the labor movement were already primed to present the generally white “middle class” OWS with tasks that would challenge the movement on questions of special oppression, class exploitation and class struggle.
Unfortunately, one of the race-related stereotypes that helps shape this social reality involves the so-called “gangsta” subculture, and its association with both crime and young, dark-skinned males, especially those in hoodies, like the one Trayvon was wearing the night he died. It’s probably this stereotype that led to Trayvon’s death.
If you feel that the mixture is too thick, thin with a little more milk, but lassis are supposed to be thick.
Your newest trick? Scaling the stairs...up is old news, but now you go down too. You will go up and down five stairs over and over. To go down, you sit on the edge and scoot your butt out, reaching with your leg and foot and toes until you can touch just touch the stair below. But you're starting to go down backwards, too, which is much faster for you and much more nerve-wracking for your mother.
Love the open shelves and bead board!
An important thing to think about when looking at our fabrics is that I washed many of the fabrics in the photos to give them a softer, more timeworn look. I created the designs with this in mind & it's how I envision people using the line, but it's really up to you whether you wash the fabrics or not. Some people like a crisper look, while others prefer the softer look with a bit of patina. I have used them both ways for different clients, depending upon their preferences. Washing the fabric, softens it and slightly fades the patterns. Many of my patterns have been intentionally mottled to give the feeling of age, but washing them adds another layer of that timeworn quality, which I love. It changes the patterns with darker backgrounds the most because the fading is more apparent. For example, I washed this fabric below, multiple times on the "heavy" cycle of the wash with towels to roughen it and left it wrinkled to give it this look:
Him: Am I in trouble?
It was not, he said later, until he went to the churches of America and found congregations aflame with righteousness, that he began to comprehend the secret of this power. Upon his return to France, de Tocqueville wrote:
But I knew where I was going. I knew I was leaving one thing behind, and moving to St. Marys, Ohio, to begin my youth ministry. I knew the salary I'd receive, and the home we'd be living in. I was moving out in faith, but I had the destination all mapped out for me.
I found a building under construction, tanked up on water and poured some all over myself form a hose. The next five minutes felt really good, arms and legs cooled off as I rode on, but the micro-climate management doesn’t last and I was drying up in no time. I passed that ox cart somewhere on the way with an exchange of hand-waving and quick questions.
She put my dad on the phone, another thing she never did, and he told me that she was no longer caring for any kids after school. Mom was a 30 year teacher of special needs children and when she retired she converted her garage into a place she could watch children. She decorated it with things from her classroom. My dad also told me that she could no longer walk and she was using a wheelchair.
Ha! Now you've all got to pay the price for my John Cusack fixation. Quoth the Raven, "You would be wise to do as Mother says, Lane Myers." Whoops! Wrong Cusack movie.
In the distance, a river
However, after two drinks I said my farewells to work colleagues and headed home, with no desire at all to have any more to drink. It was exactly what I have always wished I could do, and it felt amazing.
Anything else you’d like to add?
Q: What do you do at bedtime?
But since the murders are still going on I’m going to have to change my theory.
The following items I picked for a Grand Total of only $16 at the Covent Flea Market.
“So anyway,” Jamie says, “If I’d have been there….”
Some background: The Soviet conquest of Central Asia only really took off after the various inept and insane White Generals had been dispatched to the four corners of emigration, execution, incarceration or promotion.
12. Dah mouth dat man tek fuh court woman, ah de same mouth he ah tek an put she ah door. When a man is courting a woman, he is very concerned, kind and considerate, but when the novelty of the relationship is over, he finds faults and is unkind.
"GLITTER".
- watching the Lion King live at the theatre with its amazing costumes and scene changes (Marko and Danika)
"No." he says, in a serious tone. "You need to hear this."
In setting up a marketplace where people can shop for insurance, the state has sought advice from consumer groups, labor unions, doctors and hospitals, employers, insurance companies, agents and brokers, and American Indian tribes.
40
“Hold on,” I said, as he looked to get all excited. “Suppose we changed the game to No-Limit, .02/.05, with no ante? Would you play?”
letting go of the way she clung to the branches of her tree
The email, by the BWA’s Hari Kumar, continues: ‘We are still the new kids on the block, but two years on and amidst bookshops closing down and publishers resorting to celebrity deals in order to stay afloat, Brit Writers continues to scale new heights in the world of publishing and has seen our authors successfully published and even become best selling and award winning literary stars.’ BWA are now apparently offering a referral to ‘a number of partner agents’ which ’have asked us to help them identify potential literary gems to save them ploughing through their slush pile.’ Kumar invites writers to send in a synopsis and three chapters of fiction.
Over the years I have tried many weight loss plans, including: Fen Phen, Nutrisystem, Slim Fast, Weight Watchers, Adkins, South Beach, Sensa, and Alli, just to name a few.
Viktoria has a wonderful life now and a fantastic loving husband. She helped me separate a lot of Idema’s so called true stories and made me see the lies. The Sixth Pillar was originally, to be completed and given to Mimi Strong back in 2006. That fell through and Jack & I were going to do it alone. As I said earlier, while we were working on the book, I had reservations because Jack and I knew that it was exaggerated to say the least. The emails that he wanted to include from Donald Rumsfeld & William Boykin were fraudulent and although he did write & send them, they never were replied to. He was going to add phony responses and I was not comfortable with any of that. He thought because The Hunt for Bin Laden was such a huge success, this follow-up book would be of the same magnitude, if not bigger. That was then but this is now. Again, I am not addressing any of this rough draft now. It is froth with superficiality that shines through the first paragraph. Not to mention some of these photos. The thing about Jack was this: he seemed to know a little something about everything or so it appeared that way. He was the undisputed king of information manipulation and was quite convincing
In preparation for this momentous occasion, there was much crafting to be had from moi!
Columbus will need about seventy one from the American Meeting Canada squads soon. Prior to which, nowhere Outdoor jackets wait lineup modifications tomorrow from your NHL business timeline.
something like how you
Don't particularly care for it and my first impression was 'urgh'.
I have been missing in action from my blog this past month and ACTION is the operative word here! I have been so busy this month but have missed my blog and faithful followers! It's amazing how fast the hours in a day fly...the next thing you know a week has passed, then the next thing you know....a month has passed! It's just that time of year for me...a lot like the weeks before Christmas. The end of school is always busy with year end activities and with spring creeping in a little faster this year, yard work, planting flowers, and other spring projects have to be worked in with everything else. So....with that being said I thought I would share with you what I've been up to during the month of April!
The Bible says that God will give me the desires of my heart. Ask, seek, knock…Cast all your anxiety… all that jazz. The sparkly flashy conference teachers tell me the same thing. There are hundreds of books out there too, encouraging me to find my dream and dare to go for it, to find the extraordinary life and adventure that surely God wants me to have.
With the price for a single gallon of gasoline expected to approach $5 in some US states, Akerson’s solution for complaining motorists is simple: “buy a Volt.”
This card went to my brother and his family. I chose the cute House Mouse skater image and really dressed it up for the season. Just a few more cards to share, and we should be done. I hope that you will all treasure every second of this beautiful and magical season too. Thanks for visiting me, and I will be back again tomorrow for another post.
But your words do drift down
all of us do desire,
Graciously spread out and make your presence known.
Stuart and I are back from visiting our source for everything French and look what we found. Old French cutting boards. So many to choose from. Rounds and rectangles, small and huge. Each hand picked by our secret source for their age and beauty and shipped back to Australia. The patina is simply beautiful. These are so hot in the decorating scene at the moment and it is so rare to find old French originals in Australia. These are not reproductions. Come on in and see them, feel them. You'll fall in love.
The winter sun is warm, sleep inducing in this glassed box that moves. It reminds me of the feel of your fingers brushing against mine. I didn't quite feel them. Fingers too cold from the excitement that filled me at the thought of meeting you. The nervousness...
~ Genesis 1
But hey, it was my first attempt at a console table (with nothing but a screwdriver and some screws) so... I'm learning.
And it’s not just work life that sees us spend hours on the net; now with the obvious shift that has seen retailers turn to online retailing (etailing), we now rely on our computers, handheld devices and tablets to provide us with information-rich data on an everyday basis.
or a natural earth spirit
The most aggressive spider in the world, and I'm sharing living space with it. I must have been really really bad in my past life.
Use your own light
5. begging
That’s when I first heard the story of the two green children who were found near the Suffolk village of Woolpit at the end of the 12th century – so says Ralph, abbot of the monastery at Coggeshall (where, traditionally, everyone is a fool!)
If you are a little more budget conscious, I do recommend the Bellhaven.
The movie is based on the book ‘Moneyball: The Art of Winning an Unfair Game’ by Michael Lewis. That book, published in 2003, focused on the real-life story of GM Beane and his quest to build a successful MLB franchise in Oakland by finding the “diamonds in the rough”; players who may be undervalued by the other teams, who could still contribute in a big way based upon statistical analysis.
AUDIENCE: Top!
247 7. “George Anastaplo: An Autobiographical Bibliography (1947-1991).” John A. Murley, Robert L. Stone, and William T. Braithwaite, eds., Law and Philosophy: The Practice of Theory. Essays in Honor of George Anastaplo (Athens, Ohio: Ohio University Press, 1992), pp. 1073-1145. See Item C-1992(1), above, Items D-I/1/2001 and D-I/2/2001, below. See, also, Item D-IV/24(B)/1998, below. See, as well, Items C-2000(1) and C-2000(13), below.
When it's good
Consider contacting the cyberbully’s parents, as they may be upset by their child’s behavior and put a stop to it. Proceed cautiously, however, as they may react badly. If you decide to contact a cyberbully’s parents, communicate with them in writing—not face-to-face. Present proof of the bullying, such as copies of an e-mail message and ask them to ensure the bullying stops.
I think I might finally started getting caught up with my scrapbooking. I hadn't touched it in so long, and was actually AGAINST digital scrapbooking at first. Can you believe it!? I have now officially been converted! I've even sold all of my other scrapbooking supplies!
Before heading home to dry off, I repotted the escaped strawberry and stuck the pot on the middle of the half-full raised bed so that it wouldn’t accidentally get weeded by well-meaning helpers.
I read an article about our nation’s tendency to offer international aid, with good intentions. But we often neglect to let each country determine what aid it really needs. The author used the same example of giving misguided ‘help to the turtle. “Ask the turtle,” she admonished. “The turtle knows exactly what it needs.”
he upsets the cream-jug. He summons
It is further inspired to begin the movie with Indiana as a teenager, played by the late rier Phoenix, in order to show both just how early Indiana’s penchant from troublesome adventure started as well as the alienation from his cold father. I was never able to get into The Young Indiana Jones Chronicles because of how much I wanted the sequence to stand alone.
Certainly, some things were moving forward. Our guild finally hit level 2 at last!
Oh no, my Klout score has dropped and my follower numbers have stagnated. I'm barely getting comments! I must get back on the wagon because I must build my platform. But I don't know what to blog about anymore. I'm out of ideas. What am I going to do?
SUDDENLY, WE WERE JUST ONE MILE AWAY!!
A Madigan aide said Wednesday the idea was introduced “for discussion purposes,” but the effect was to mobilize mayors and city managers from every corner of Illinois. They warned that Madigan’s proposal would be a gut-punch to cities that are already stretching every dollar.
3. Will you go out with me?………. to McDonald’s? +
This photo was taken by our son, Allen, of Benjamin and I for an Anti-Abortion paper he wrote for English in College.
· Place a great deal of emphasis on mysticism and hidden knowledge ( Gnosis)
“‘I wanted air,’ said the boy.
Needing the finish, Griffin came out in the third looking to land a punch that would keep the fight from going to the scorecards of the judges. He was able to do just that.
* OPI Black Shatter
And I am driving...I always have to be driving when things like this happen.
It is this collective that mediums draw from and where i receive my information from. There are different levels to link into, avoid the level where fear dominates; you too can choose what you connect to by using your mind with intention.
-ridiculous amounts of water
Not of the burritos, that is. Sorry. Nonetheless I’d consider yesterday a success. I like burritos & I like photography.
Aside from being an eponymous fashionista, Lee- Anne is completing her doctoral degree at the Institute of Medical Sciences at the University of Toronto. I bet you she is the most stylish girl in her class!
Live Action Book Trailer Contest for Film-making Enthusiasts from K.M. Walton (click flyer on the bulletin board). Prizes include $500 cash and personal film critiques by top industry professionals. Deadline: Jan. 17.
While under contract for Educational, Temple was loaned to other studios. Her first appearance in a feature film was a conspicuous supporting role in Red Haired Alibi for Tower Productions, Inc. in 1932.[20][21] In 1933, she made several short films for Educational and was loaned for bit parts in feature films at Universal, Paramount, and Warner Bros..[22][23]
“I was there for you when you needed me. I was there for you when you were afraid. I was there for you when you were crying and depressed. But, when I needed you, you could not be bothered.”
O you who believe! If you help (in the cause of) Allah, He will help you and make your foothold firm. (V.47:7)
Ink: Real Red, Chocolate Chip
I picked up Dalton and we headed over to Darryl's house, which is pretty cool when you have three people on your design team that can get together and brainstorm over things and I drew out a much better -to scale- world map. We discussed a bunch of timeline issues, including the thorny question of why are there Dinosaurs in Garnia? Chronomancy by those ecology loving Elves, or rather their more magically powerful ancestors, the Sidhe. It was a failed experiment because the forces of Darkness launched an invasion into their experimental Chronomantic area, Goblins mainly, driving the Sidhe Chronomancers either away or killing them, are those secrets lost? Were they stolen by the forces of Evil? Or were they simply destroyed? All I know is that there is a pretty cool "Lost World" area to go adventuring, and it had some weird ancient ruins too, as well as all the Tyrannosaurus Rexii and Veliciraptors, wild Goblins, and Lizards Men, both primitive and advanced, and all manner of other jungle and swamp dwelling goodness.
My dad tells us that later, when salles de dance (dance halls) started opening in rural St. Martin parish, there were still dance contests, though the halls added Jitterbug, Polka and Charleston categories to the competitions.
10. You are beautiful. You are enough. The world we live in is twisted and broken and for your entire life you will be subjected to all kinds of lies that tell you that you are not enough. You are not thin enough. You are not tan enough. You are not smooth, soft, shiny, firm, tight, fit, silky, blonde, hairless enough. Your teeth are not white enough. Your legs are not long enough. Your clothes are not stylish enough. You are not educated enough. You don’t have enough experience. You are not creative enough.
We supped some Lake Placid Ubu Ale, a musty, smoky, and rather complex brown ale with a light body. Not a bad way to start off. Then came the Regenboog 'TSmisje Dubbel, brewed with honey and dates. The only Regenboog I've had was their Kerst, which really blew me away. However, this offering didn't do as much for me. It was sweet and boozy, similar to an Old Ale, but with less of a syrupy malt flavor. Something about it didn't overly impress me, but I like the idea behind it regardless.
I’m gonna let it shine
Overall it was the best weekends I could have imagined and such an amazing way to propose! I am seriously on cloud 9 every time I remember that we are getting married! I will put pictures of the ring up soon too, it is gorgeous!
Truth can be called error for only so long, and then it has a way of creeping back in as persistently as water seeps through a roof or light finds a way through the smallest crack in the door. Truth persists. If nothing else, the blind lawyer has forced the world to see the undying nature of truth. The blind lawyer was able to see the reality of Communist impotence. For Communism (or any totalitarian regime) to work, a certain view of reality must be imposed and enforced. Dissent cannot be allowed because by its nature it dispels the reality of the darkness. When light enters a room, darkness disappears. Thus, the light of dissent is, as the Germans would say, verboten in Communist countries.
If you're not a conservative at the age of 40, you have no brain."
To his credit, the speaker went on to acknowledge the obvious fact that the orchestra's policies are both sexist and racist - but added that he believed these ills to be worth accepting. I would respectfully disagree.
"Mommy!" the girl called. The mother signaled for the girl to follow her out. I couldn't make out what she said, but whatever it was, the girl turned and started to walk in the other direction. And that's when it happened.
Next stop? Cambria. A cute little town near Heart Castle with shops, restaurants and wine tasting. We went to Moonstone Cellars and enjoyed a lovely afternoon of wine tasting and then had lunch before heading back to Morro Bay. Back at Morro Bay we did a little shopping, got a coffee and napped. When we were shopping I saw an old VW hippie van that was totally rusted out. A cute little dog was sitting in it, waiting for his person. There was a 'For Sale' sign on the van. I think I probably could've bought it for what was in my pocket at the time. A view of Morro Rock
The service was attentive and friendly, the restaurant was packed with groovy young things (ourselves not included) and the bill was reasonable. Perhaps the best part of the meal though is stepping out the door, onto the Pont Neuf, and taking a post-prandial stroll as you stare up river and drink in one of the most beautiful views in the world.
Things are still looking good! Dr. Graff said her lungs still sound clear, and he's working with the insurance company to get her approved for Synagis one last time this season. We're still a little bit concerned about her weight gain: she's up to 19 lbs 5 oz, and still around the 3% mark on the charts. At least she's back on the charts this visit! The nutritionist and I are going to work on charting what she's eating to see if we can find other ways to boost the calorie content of her food. Part of the problem is her ever increasing mobility, and now that she's walking it's only going to make things worse. And both the nutritionist and Dr. Graff reminded me that when we adjust Judith's age, she's really not doing bad with her weight.
We feel so blessed an honored to have celebrated Ruth's 3rd Birthday! She was so excited to have presents and cake!!!!! Grandpa and Grandma brought donuts over for breakfast, then we went to the Fort, to the buffet, took a nap and had a party!!!
What happens when our intake of calories, nutritive factors and complementary factors are A) insufficient or B) excessive.
in circles so excited and never looked down
and finally as part of the
We had a wonderful Christmas. Annabelle was so much fun this year. She got so excited when she got her presents and she would say "Oh Thank you!" I love the Christmas season and I loved all the parties and hanging out with the family. I would say we definitely had a good, crazy fun year.
Twas the night before our Christmas and all through O4,
As I am driving to my husbands job yesterday I pass airmen running, soldiers PT'ing in the middle of the road.
As a postscript to my thoughts on high street versions of designer trends I thought I would draw attention to the most copied garment on the high street this season - the shearling aviator jacket - as seen in the Burberry Prorsum AW 2010 collection. I don't think there is a British high street chain that has not produced their own version. Christopher Bailey can hardly complain. Most of the stock of the original version has already sold out at full price!
In Australia, one has to live there three out of a period of five years before they are eligible to become PRs.
Of course, our afternoon adventure became quite memorable when Becky made an unexpected discovery.
Lovage - To Catch a Thief
However, in order to fulfill this calling on our lives it is necessary that we also share in the empowerment that was on Christ when he was in the world. This is the mantle that He passed on to us at Pentecost (cf., “The Double portion Anointing”), this is what the “Promise of the Father” is all about. And, it is in accepting and receiving the Promise of the Father through the baptism of the Spirit that we reclaim the fullness of our spiritual inheritance in Christ (cf., Eph. 1: 16-18).
But I still want to keep my paddle.
Ognibene said going after Bart Haggerty was completely out of bounds.
She chose skulls and Santa hats from my new BM plates and said I should combine them. It didn't look that well in my mind as it turned out to be, I admit.
Love is the new religion of the 21st century
Dindi 04:16
Yoghurt:2 tbsp
And begin to hope, those who dare
Next shop was the cloisonné factory. Unlike the jade store, here we actually got to see HOW cloisonné was made.
We met the same motley crew as the night before (less the good Doctor) and Erin & I introduced Julie to the wonders of the tequila shot.
But just when you think the Doc is in danger of turning into an old smoothie, he’ll make a sharp turn back to the crazy spirit that drove him to produce the hoodoo-soaked sounds that made him famous in the first place. There are lesser-known but worthy records like 1994’s Television and 2001’s Creole Moon (featuring a depiction of the voodoo graveyard loa Baron Samedi on the cover). A couple of years ago he released Tribal, a swampy R & B workout that reminded fans of Dr. John’s glory years.
Caring about ‘something‘ can mean caring about someone……
There’s nothing illegal about saying what you want or what you feel on the internet, barring actual, physical, specific threats on a person. She’s free to spout off any advice she wants. She reminds me of Bill O’Reilly, in fact. She spins a hard “truth” that’s not really all that accurate, in layman’s terms, edgy in her apparent sincerity. She’s playing the internet base like he plays Fox News’ fan base. But you know who has a lot of haters? Bill O’Reilly. It’s part of the game, Heather. So, I guess I would say, “lol, suck it up, you knew what you were signing up for.” And then I could delete it, but I probably won’t.
heat to medium, and cook
In a large saucepan coated with cooking spray, cook the onion, carrots and celery in butter for 3-5 minutes on medium heat. Add broccoli; cook 3-5 minutes longer. Stir in 2-3/4 cups milk, salt, thyme, rosemary and pepper.
In the end the doctor decided that he wants to see us in 6 months to make sure that he has made an actual improvement in language. Otherwise we may need to be referred to a specialist. That will give us three months after our next evaluation with PAT. So here's crossing my fingers that he continues to improve.
__The forest-steppe and forest natural areas of Ukraine were inhabited by the agricultural tribes of east Slavs, whose life and prosperity were constantly exposed to the raids of steppe nomads.
There's not much else left.
Police have cracked an insurance fraud syndicate and arrested three suspected serial killers for the murders of 21 people.
Because I'm a schmoopy sentimental, I gave each of my ten friends at dinner a personal little toast -- they all mean so much to me. (So much that I spilled wine on myself in my effort to show them that!)
Anyway this morning I know I hit my log-in button at 9.30 on the button. I was outraged. My manager said it was all down in black and white she had the print-outs to prove her point. I’d logged in at 9.36 there was no arguing.
although a lot of women enjoy their bodies and experience wonderful orgasms, it seems that in a world obsessed with body image and over-achieving, woman have added their 'inability to orgasm' to their list of reasons to feel shit about themselves.
1st CFL-1 Debbie Walker
Everything I know about writing I learned by studying acting at age 8 - 25 and by reading wonderful books and plays starting very early. I was very taken by the work of Tennessee Williams, Sherwood Anderson, Wendy Wasserstein. I've never taken a formal writing class. Everything I learned as a writer came from the early training, such as working with sense-memory recall, and how to develop an awareness of character motivation. Showing through this behavior, not telling.
Michelle Harrison’s novel is chilling and surprising as the story twists and turns to a final gut churning ending. Readers who have enjoyed Long Lankin by Lindsey Barraclough or Into the Grey by Celine Kiernan will really enjoy Unrest, highly recommended.
I guess I just want people to evaluate themselves here . Figure out if you would really be "saving" all that money with coupons or not . If the coupons aren't for something you would normally buy , then don't bother . It would be much more beneficial to spend your time planning meals that match up with your local grocery stores weekly sales .
So to achieve their aims the TWG and FIA have agreed a two step reduction on nose height. When we talk of noses there are two elements to this. Firstly the nose tip, this is the very visible, end of the nose cone structure. Then secondly the front bulkhead (referred to by the FIA as section A-A), this is where the nose cone mounts to the chassis.
still a mystery.
Just a few to get you going on this lovely Monday morning. I know there are dozens of others, I’ll save those for another day. Would love to hear any stories you have with these, please leave a comment.
You must be getting sleepy...
There are ways in which each of the specific disadvantages of FAR can be mitigated in those zoning districts (and future areas) where it might be needed.
The Graeme Hall National Park was dead.
from trancyhive-tales:
THE Democratic Alliance in KZN is concerned that possible “insider collusion” may be behind the sudden upsurge in rhino poaching in KZN’s game reserves and called on Conservation and Environment MEC Lydia Johnson to urgently investigate the matter.
And so they become good, obedient, nice, clean, perfect, sweet, shaped just according to the framework set by their egocentric parents. After some thirty years or so they will start seeing a psychotherapist or attend personal growth workshops in order to climb out of these fixed attitudes that will be by then already fully integrated into their personalities, they will strive to grow out of the automatic role they have adopted in order to emotionally survive…, and they will start to get in touch with who and what they really are.
*Books may be used to count for other challenges as well.
If you come with 2- 4 ppl in a group , the fees will be much more cheaper and nak praktis bercakap pun senang( but the choice is yours)
The gang ransacked the house, stealing jewellery, computers and other small valuables. The robbers also took a computer box capturing the CCTV footage in the house. After emptying a safe, they demanded the keys for a locked vault in which the woman's husband kept his hunting weapons. But the husband was away and he had the keys with him.
“Somewhere Over The Rainbow”
1. Lovin' my hubby and helping him with things around the house. I have neglected our house (a lot) in the last couple of weeks which is NOT in my character whatsoever. I'm just a bit OCD and lately, you'd never know.
Sidebar: You can get a T-shirt of Filiberto from RICANSTRUCTED… RICANSTRUCTED is a design company i founded that is dedicated to the independence of Puerto Rico.
That dreary hour he mounts his beast in;
Journalism's rules account for some of the awkwardness in phrasing. We can’t call it "murder" or call Charles Stuart the killer, since he wasn’t charged and didn’t confess. So what’s the most economical edit that makes the report accurate? Is there a neater solution than "pleaded guilty to helping conceal evidence about the killing"?
Nuts:
I am a big fan of Cut out & keep ...I will most likely Creep it daily for inspiration - Check it out! its awesome. I'm Definitely also going to have to check out Pintrest... I just have a hard time figuring out new sites. Know of someplace I can find some inspiration? Share in the comment section below!
Tuesday: Band, 2:45-5:45 (I quit Girl Scouts for Band)
Water.
My first hour in Bilbao was euphoric. This red abstract bridge overhang was waiting for us as the bus crossed the river into the city. The Guggenheim Museum, one of Bilbao’s famous attributes, was waiting for us on the other side of the river. It seemed strategically placed at the entrance of Bilbao for all the tourists coming from the airport.
CONSERVATIVE: rationalisation of pasties pies sausage rolls. Pie pasty
“I asked for myrrh!”
Will the overseas Universities who deemed Malaysia’s Bar Council and Judiciary based LEGAL JUNTA ‘legal professional graduates’, withdraw all the degrees of these mindlessly pro-establishment seat warmers that refuse to amend laws, to give the people of Malaysia a proper stand against the oppressive apartheid government and these colluding NGOs registered with the biased ROS? These groups are not doing their jobs at all.
If you registered for the cancelled Winter Martini Modern, you do not have to register again. We have reserved your registration for this event.
Frank Hubbard
This I have been doing non-stop since last Friday. The issue here is instead of remembering it was supposed to be one last meal, I have been quite focused on eating whatever "prohibited" food (emphasis mine) one last time. After a week of bacchanalia I feel pretty shitty.
I suppose we're drifting ever closer to cracking this mo-fo wide open with lawyers, bombs and millions dead. But you know something? I'd still rather be with you, America. After all, I've got 37 years up in this.
Some stars and public figures have ‘go-to’ designers for every occasion, designers whose creations tend to suit the wearer’s personality and style, and which are always event appropriate. Audrey Hepburn had Givenchy, and Kate seems to return again and again to McQueen for dresses to wow at the most important, glitzy occasions. With her slim frame, Kate knows that the signature McQueen dress will instantly create an ultra feminine shape whilst ramping up the glamour and creating a stand-out look to set her apart from everyone else there.
Two priests during the Inquisition use torture to get a "heretic" to repent.
still surround by mystery
4) Find the middle of the strands and place the pencil across it.
09. Revolution
The steering committee met before the regular meeting on Saturday, and one of the items on the agenda concerned how to handle group business between committee meetings. I had been doing it with the thought that the committee could overturn anything they didn’t like, and I rather suspected they would want me to continue, which they did. Later, I thought that I would be just as happy if two or three people shared the responsibility with me, but as soon as I thought that, I realized that for me to do it alone saves a lot of time.
Drain the lentils, remove the carrot, celery and parsley, and set the lentils aside.
You rarely forget or forgive which might sometimes be a blessing as you have a notoriously bad memory anyway.
As for books, I am just starting chapter one of "The Paris Wife" written by Paula McLain.....a fictional novel about Ernest Hemingway and his first wife, Hadley, during the 1920s. I have a hunch I will enjoy it.
Months went by. I asked guy friends of mine. They already had dates. Kathleen attempted to set me up. Nothing worked. One week before prom I still didn’t have a date. I didn’t want to be the third wheel. Looks like I was going to have to do the unthinkable: ask Fred to prom.
sealed for the day of redemption. All bitterness, fury, anger, shouting, and reviling must be
40. Caffeine significantly increases intra-ocular pressure in the eyes, contributing to glaucoma and macular degeneration.
Fareda: What do you mean, Anwaar?
General comment: Solid blend in the Scottish style. Kirin blends often use Scottish whisky in the mix.
I am astounded that the first Dimensión Costeña album I posted is the most popular, by far, on this site. Well, folks, here is the next infusion of coastal Nicaraguan party music. Like their first record, this one has a long Caribbean medley for extended dance mayhem and, as the title suggests, abundant sweat. The best song on this album, however, is the great "Cole, Cole," which is a guaranteed hit on any dance floor.
He stopped to draw air in, to peek back over his shoulder. They seemed far behind already and awfully tiny as seen at the bottom of that narrow flight of stone steps, and Tom wasn’t even halfway through the stairway. He looked up in the foaming darkness at which bony branches slashed to the rhythm of the unseen wind. The house stood darker than the night, its stones like tar, only its high windows inflamed with dancing shadows, as if huge fires licked the glass. He looked down again at his friends, twelve-year olds Ghost, Elf, and Death, standing with their jack-o’-lanterns and their bags for candy on the orange-lit pavement as if they were on a far-off stage and he was watching them from the gallery, right under the theatre’s roof. A Witch had joined them and Tom could’ve told who she was even from that distance, even if he hadn’t heard her voice calling him – she had a witch’s hair, no need for wigs, copper curls flowing to her waist.
Forgiving itself the body works only fleetingly but it will work, tethered to the plough…
Thy honking horn designed to wake the whole world from its sleep!
"And this way it won't be so tangled in the morning."
One of my tables who was actually pretty cool put it best,"This girl looks like she took one to many classes at Flirty Girl Fitness." So some of my tables leave and then it is down to the regulars and my boss and friends. Well I go over to bring Cowboy Casanova some more drinks and homegirl starts up again and they tell me to jump out of the way because now she is using her jacket as a prop. I turn away and let them watch and don't get in the way. I am in awe of how much balls this girl has because I know I would never do this. DJ Snoop comes outside with me and says I can't believe this happened here. I explained that this is the wildest I have ever seen it but yes weird. He is figuring out what the hell is going on and why this girl would do the stripper moves, I have no answer.
A player who plays like the love child of Bobo Balde and Claude Makelele, Wanyama has made an excellent start to his career at Parkhead with his versatility proving a great asset for the team. At only £900,000 he already looks like a bargain signing and has won over hoops fans with his style of play, as well as wearing his number 67 jersey as homage to the Lisbon Lions. Wanyama made his national debut for Kenya aged just 15, an age when most boys are concerned about slipping a hand under someone’s jersey than donning their national one. A quick look at his performance in the last Old Firm game shows that this is a player who is destined for the big stage.
Let me paint a picture for you. My uncle died in 19…98 I think. Since then my aunt had a nervous breakdown and became a recluse. She lost her job and draws disability so she never has to leave and in fact doesn’t go outside for weeks at a time. Since 1998 she has kept every single piece of mail, grocery bags, etc. I walk in and the only open spaces are pathways to the bedrooms and bathroom. Junk is piled up about five foot high in the air.
Where the football player had gone off to was the office, to get some help. The Principal and Asst. Principal, not knowing the details of what had happened, found the guy in front of the school and told him he had to leave. Creepy Old Guy agreed, and headed toward his car. As soon as they turned around to go back in however, he started to go back to the entrance I had used. They were still watching him though, and came back out to chase him down. He saw them and ran back to his car, got in and drove off. When he got to the road he stopped and tried to grab one of the girls trying to cross the street, but she got away.
Well, maybe I will stop here for this post. I have an entire acre of backyard FULL of maple leaves just calling my name! Enjoy the sunshine!!
Ladies and germs, welcome to Round Two.
GOP regulars and political pundits still shrug her off as a possible GOP presidential candidate in 2012. And she's still a favored running joke of late night comics. But this has endeared her to many as a scorned mother non-politician. That serves to keep her public stock and appeal high. The Christine O'Donnell and Joe Miller GOP senate primary victories in Delaware and Alaska sent her stock through the ceiling.
Finally, an investigation of this monstrous crime against nature and humanity must be carried out by committees of workers in the oil industry, working with scientists and engineers accountable to the working class. We call on the International Trade Union Conference, the AFL-CIO, and the United Steelworkers (now home to the former Oil, Chemical, and Atomic Workers Union) to form an independent, international workers' commission of inquiry into this totally preventable disaster. We would want them to interview everyone who ever worked on this project, and every living victim of the explosion and its results, and to gather information not only on the immediate environmental and economic effects of the disaster, but also on the long term health effects to cleanup workers and Gulf residents, and other indirect consequences.
and that kind of feels like a lesson for life. that when i'm panicking about something i can choose to give in, and make the fear feel real even if it's not, or i can choose to take enough time to calm myself down and then get the hell on with something else.
-Did you hear about the two fish that went all the way around Australia? Yeah, they end up in Cairns. (Aussies pronounce "Cairns" as "Cans.")
The flight itself was about 30 km and for those who know the area the task was Woodrat-Rabies-Burnt-Rabies and then a new landing zone near Purcell (in the valley on the way to Applegate Lake). With each valley crossing I was sure I'd sink out, but just kept repeating my mantra of the day "Never Leave Lift". It was really hard to battle my natural impatient instincts of just flying on when I feel I'm "high enough". I have to thank Sandy who I overheard on launch...he'd said that if he got over 6000 feet he would go directly to goal from Rabies without stopping to tank up at Woodrat. Little tidbits like that are invaluable and the reason I fly here with my vario set to feet (even though the course is measured in metric). I actually got my best climb of the day right after the last turnpoint (actually over China Gulch) and when my altitude read over 6200 ft I held my breath, stepped on my speed bar (which I had a good talking to before launch) and flew down the valley towards goal.
Very! It’s SO good to see you, I missed you! I know it’s only been a few days, but it feels like it’s been so long.
Death Dentist
- Albert Einstein
Tori looked crestfallen.
JonTron. The other half of the founders of NormalBoots, (Ironic Espadrilles? Lazy Slippers? Vengeful Wellingtons?)and, well, I just don’t know what to say here. This guy is as much a comedic inspiration as he is fantastic. And that’s quite a lot. His videos are fresh and original, his content is genuinely funny (especially involving Jacques!!), and his choices of games for review are certainly varied to say the least. His most recent review, for Star Wars Kinect, actually had me in tears. To be honest, it’s his reviews that inspired me to feature “Gaming” on my blog at all (I tend not to talk about the fifteen gorillas on my back).
Which is why I’m trying to get my head around what life means. I want to be able to embrace my death when the time comes. As somehow, in some inexplicable way, it is part of the gift of life, not just its price.
I also have to say that I think Whimsical is such a great name for this polish. I dare say that I like it even better than I like the name Glitter in the Air. And besides it being such a perfect name, it also makes me smile every time I think of it because I'm a huge Big Bang Theory fan. And to quote Dr. Sheldon Cooper, "What's life without whimsy?"
Subsequent footage showed a now-bloodied Gaddafi being hustled through a frenzied crowd, before he disappears in the crush and the crackle of gunfire can be heard.
W: Weight watcher!
Did I actually make it on time this time? Well, barely, but I'll take it ;-)
As a follow up to my last post the mall officially (and begrudgingly) closed at 6:00 pm Saturday night. From what I understand that by 5:30 pm there were only a handful of stores still open anyway. No word as of yet if we'll be fined for starting the mass exodus ourselves.
the random number thingy said its no39
Fretless bass, played well, is a highly emotive instrument, to my ears. I love the range of wails, slides and glides, the subtle tonal swells and the buzzes, pops and clicks that can be produced. With a chorus or flanger, the fretless bass takes on a liquid, almost ethereal quality. I love that sound.
I've digressed. Anyway, in conclusion, screw health food and energy drinks.
$0.40 off Pillsbury of Grands! Sweet Rolls
I was also fortunate enough to be featured in the Customer Spotlight of The Greeting Farm's November newsletter!!! What an honor! I included some projects I am working on for the upcoming holidays.
Melancholia is an artistic film, which probably turns most audiences off, the same audiences not wanting to be depressed while watching a film. Most people attend the theater for escapism, not looking to be reminded of the utter destruction we could possible face in our futures, and unfortunately for them, that is exactly what Melancholia’s plot does, set around a planet called “Melancholia” headed in earth’s direction. It brings to light what very little time we may have on earth and how one rogue planet could end us all. Lars von Trier makes his intentions clear within the first scenes, not wanting the audience to be caught in the suspense and mystery of the eventual outcome and to focus solely on his characters and their emotions during the crisis.
Well, that is about enough for today. I will announce the winner of my Penguins of Madagascar DVD review tomorrow.
As we approached Inkpen at 1040 we could see lots of gliders in the air, some quite high, and our pulses rose to match!
1 cup shredded Cheddar cheese (about 4 ounces)
Oh and here's a nice little picture of dad and me that was taken on our Harvard tour. I was going for the "bookish-cute" look in my coat and scarf. Thank you JCrew corduroy for keeping me warm!
And so I feel summer-logged. Perhaps it is something like being becalmed and hoping that a gentle wind will catch the sails and set you free. It isn't that I have not had "a good summer" so far. But basically, I am not a summer person. When fall comes, I feel like it is my season as it is quieter.
I don't really know what else to say other than you're welcome for the gift I have bestowed upon you all with this masterpiece of naked hairy weirdness. I feel like we all know each other well enough now that I can openly admit I'm a little traumatized by this gentleman. I may have trouble sleeping tonight. And if I'm traumatized simply by looking at this cover, how must that poor little bear feel pressed up against his no-doubt fuzzy goods? Our stuffed purple friend is going to need therapy, but I for one am extremely grateful for his presence as it hides a view I'm not sure I'd ever recover from if I saw it.
A sweet yeast pastry form Czech normally stuffed with either sweet of savory filling. It is quite time consuming to make but worth your effort.
At Sheridan’s perjury trial, advocate-depute Alex Prentice QC dismissed the significance of phone hacking during his summation to the jury, claiming it was irrelevant to the charge and pointed to the testimony of Detective Chief Superintendent Williams. The police officer had told the jury he found “no evidence” that Sheridan’s voicemail had been accessed illegally.
What was your path towards publication like?
For me, what excites me most about Breathless beyond its still-startling technical innovations and its exultant celebration/deconstruction of American crime-genre conventions is how all of it advances a particular worldview, one of genuine intellectual and emotional curiosity about what makes his pair of young characters tick. This film is one cool cat...but, like the best American genre films, it frequently goes beyond its surface coolness to penetrate the essences of its two main characters: one seemingly without a care in the world except, perhaps, what he grasps in the movies (thus his lip-touching mannerisms and his self-conscious emulations of Humphrey Bogart); the other more worldly and concerned with her own future. In its own jazzed-up way, it's a character study—and while that certainly isn't the only way to approach this eternally fresh and endlessly fascinating classic, I submit that it's on that level that Breathless will endure the most. Certainly for another 50 years.
John MacArthur explains:
Chapter 12 is similar to Chapter 11 and 13. This one, however is used by farmers as well as their families. Farmers are never able to predict what their profits will be for the year. For this reason, chapter 12 will have different guidelines suited for farmers, but will also consist of a proposed repayment plan.
Well, Dave, “political legacy” is another way to say history and unfortunately, America is not big on history beyond the iconic after-images.
AUTISM INFORMATION THANKS TO MY YAHOO NEWS PAGE
Isn't it amazing how versatile a blindingly fluorescent color piece of furniture can be? Above you can see the Offcut Fluoro Bench by Tom Dixon looking fabulous with plywood and chalkboard black , and below the Offcut Stool coordinating perfectly with white floors and olive green.
Frosty the Traveler, had a plane to catch that day
But she insisted that we have to do an assessment simply because the wheels were in motion. Then it was less funny but still frivolous. So we set up a time to drop by the school so Khubz could speak.
SD: I think one of the most exciting moments of my career was being featured as one of the "Top Ten Bridal Blogs" in the January 2010 issue of BRIDES magazine. I also must mention the daily feedback I receive from readers...It's so incredibly rewarding and inspiring to hear from my sweet readers.
2. Poisson Rouge: If you haven’t indulged it the joy of the Red Fish you really need to check it out! No instructions and some areas are undeniable French (it is a French website after all) but within the madness there are some great activities The ‘School of English‘ (the castle) is quite handy for learning vocab and other languages are supported too – making it great for MFL. In the bugs section (flower on the windowsill) there are lovely basic mouse skills activities and matching games that would be useful to use with pupils in EY or SEN settings. Everything is brightly coloured and engaging. Some items might be a little annoying (the choir is distinctly odd) but there is a wealth of usefulness within the site – both ICT skills wise and across other curriculum areas.
Lovers of rock and roll and fans of the Eagles are going to want to find Eagles: Taking it to the Limit by Ben Fong-Torres in their Christmas stocking. ($30.00, Running Press). Just out this month, it’s a large format, coffee table book to celebrate the 40th anniversary of the band’s formation. It’s been a long trip from the bar of the Troubadour on Santa Monica Boulevard in 1971 to the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame. The author is renowned for his many books on the music scene and the book is handsomely and extensively illustrated with many photos from the past four decades, along with an excellent text. Responsible for many classics, “Peaceful Easy Feeling”, Desperado”, “Hotel California” and “New Kid in Town”, the band spent ten years together living the rock and roll dream, but in addition to the constant touring, there were the usual tensions and fights that go with that lifestyle. It’s a great story, captured between two covers.
The snow has disappeared. Green has returned and I'm sure this morning I heard the tiniest hint of spring in the birdsong?
2. Talent is a gift, but character is a choice. We have no control over a lot of things in life. We don’t get to choose our parents or the circumstances of our birth and upbringinig. But we DO CHOOSE our character. We create it each time we make choices.
Take some 1" elastic and cut it to your waist measurement. For Leyla this was 20". Attach a safety pin to one end of the elastic then insert it into the casing, Use your fingers to guide the pin around the casing until it comes out the other side. Overlap the elastic 1" and stitch together, making sure it is not twisted. Rearrange the gathers and try the skirt on your little girl. If it fits then great! If not then you will want to unpick the stitches on your elastic and shorten/lengthen it slightly.
She is also is adorned in unmounted grey rubber (sentiment not included) and has been stamped a total of one time (sinful isn't it?)).
My great weakness in trying to write about beer is describing the flavors. I just don't have the descriptive facility that some reviewers have, and I really have no idea how to describe these beers, except to say that they both taste similar to one another, which makes it puzzling why they'd be released at the same time.
"It's just to show you that I've been trying to see if there's a pattern to the seizures. If they relate to when I get an Avastin shot, and how far apart the seizures are."
Other virtues, such as consideration, excellence, faithfulness, generosity, hope, goodness, righteousness, purity and incorruptibility become easier to attain when we are honest with ourselves and others around us.
I admit, i am forever fascinated with Pappano's music and his talent for communication :-)
I want to say how lucky I am to have such a wonderful fan base and group of friends. I hope to see some of my scrappy friends in Kitchener.
Ellie Vicente, Hannah & Molly Schutzius, Tiff and Ivy Martin
1. Summoning Blackness - 01:02
Doing others’ jobs is clearly not productive. Both the faculty and the staff spend precious energy for little or no return. Besides, their assumptions may be flat wrong. The colleague may be perfectly happy to consult, and the co-workers may prefer to take on extra work so the sick staff can stay away from the office, rest, and return at 100%. Unfortunately, neither the faculty nor the staff can possibly know this if they insist on doing others’ jobs for them and depriving their colleagues the opportunity to state their needs.
The funny thing is, one of my goals of 2012 is to NOT plan so much and to not be overwhelmed. Planning to stay organized is one thing; planning to an obsessive extent is completely different. I'm an "it's all in the details" kind of person, yet I know it's time to take a step back when I'm laying in bed at night mentally practicing how to tie the perfect bow with my ribbon, perfectly color-coordinated to my wrapping paper and how I'm going to attach the color-coordinated initial ornaments that I bought for each gift. Brian sometimes says my mind must be a scary place at times-- agree.
There does not appear to be an adequate support network in place, or indeed any support network at all.
The Bryant & May strike was of course famous in our part of the world when I was growing up in the 1950s. There was even a musical about it in the 1960s.
Highly abundant and highly changed
That babes point at with shouts and gapes.
I appreciate your understanding in this matter (cause of course this is a formal business letter) and I wish you all the happiest and best holiday season filled with gratitude and joy. :)
Finally the spotting almost stop around 16 weeks but another problem surfaced...I had a bad case of yeast infection. Damn! My Gynae gave me an internal exam and found out that some of the blood vessels on my cervix was bleeding! My Gynae applied some chemical to stop the bleeding. Came home with some cream and vaginal pesary (to be inserted into the vagina).
Happy Easter Monster Maniacs! Everybody loves rabbits right? They are cute, cuddly and make great pets. I'm sure that many of you gave a rabbit as a gift to innocent child this Easter didn't you?
These old people who once lived a life of content and raised their children, educated them and gave them wings now sit huddled in dark , smelly rooms, deprived of even a decent meal and basic health care.
That was a wake-up call. Her concerns involved the term “heavy-duty mixer” and the usage of parchment paper to line the baking sheet.
We leave them in a strong position. I can see these two marrying and spending the rest of their lives together. They have staying power. They work at their relationship, really work at it, and I think this makes them good role models for the teenage audience this is aimed at. Too many couples these days are only too willing to walk away when things get tough. However, I’m not a fan of the cringe-worthy mushiness Caine keeps shoving in our faces. They love each other, it shows. Please, don’t go overboard.
Slice the loaf open lengthwise and lay it flat on a baking sheet. Fill the center with half of the dip mixture, (or all of it if you halved the recipe.) Sprinkle the reserved cheese on top. Wrap the exposed edges of the bread in foil so they don't burn.
Pewter Jumbo Eyelets
I doubt I have to recap for any of you all out there what a true miracle this was. Three clomid cycles. Five IUI cycles. Four IVF cycles. Twelve negative attempts at a minimum. And suddenly, the biggest surprise of our lives. Something we never saw coming.
The rest of the embellishments were made with the Martha Stewart Doily Lace punch and the scalloped edge in red card was created with a Tonic edger punch - pulled together with black ribbon tied in a bow. Whew!!
And, as evidenced by Dr Lager’s suit jacket, there really is no such thing as a free lunch.
He: Yes.
Pre-order today so she can continue to sell these shoes in her boutique! Every lady who does Regency costuming needs a pair of these. :) Gentlemen, this is a lovely Christmas gift idea.
On the wall above it, is my most favourite piece of delft blue ware, the Dutch coffee grinder. To the right on the bench I keep the salt pot, a container with a brush I use for dipping in oil and a spoon rest, again all in Delft blue. It was a hobby of mine to get things to go into my "Dutch" kitchen and follow the blue theme which took a quite some time over the last 10 years before we went on the pension. I'm glad I did now, as this is the part of the house we spend most of our time and it has become a comfortable place to work in amongst my little treasures. It's not a big kitchen but very functional and I love being in there."
Mother Buffalo
The third is a fab shoe in a box with a hidey hole underneath perfect for a choccy bar.
A Weizenbock. The only time I had one of those was in Austin, and it was not up to snuff. Just plain boring. St Arn did a homebrew competition in Weizenbocks, and let the winner brew one batch of the stuff and sell it. Cost me 15 bucks a 6 pack. They could have charged 30.
I have an ongoing fascination with the connection between the past and present, be it historical or fantastical. This remains the driving force behind my artistic expression. Classical and fantasy literature, abbey ruins shrouded in mist, wonderfully gnarled trees and skillfully decorated manuscript pages inspire my style which is often described as being "medieval" in mood.
There were plenty of dishes that I fell in love with. First and foremost, every baked good I tried was absolutely divine. My favorites were the banana bread, herbed sada roti, and dal puri roti. I also gained a new respect for chickpeas. The way that Taymer handles them in this book has resulted in some of the tenderest and most flavorful chickpeas I've ever had in my life. I feel like that's a bold statement for a vegan to make, but I stand by it. I also fell in love with the doubles (especially the chickpea stew), the chickpea curry, Creole sauce, ham, and eggplant choka.
for a great number of us, change equals resistance or a "heels dug in firmly in refusal" to shift out of the current and into something unknown... some of us hold so tightly to where we are, that nothing can dynamite us forward, thus losing the opportunities that this forward movement brings into our lives... stuck by fear, by indecision, or even by the "well we have always done it this way" mentality, so robs us of experiences that can and should enrich our lives...
PLQPU Blog (plqpublog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
See? Low.
Traditionally nickel was used in white gold, however, nickel is no longer used in most white gold made today as nickel can cause reactions with some people. We do not use nickel in our white gold
What is your best organizational tip?
2. Pay my rent off until my lease ends. That will give me time to figure out where to move when my lease is over.
I pray for this day, Lord. May our upcoming worship celebration be acceptable to you. May we cast aside everything that hinders us and worship you with reckless abandon this morning. I pray for our worship leader for today, that his spirit might be one with your Spirit as he leads us, and that he, too, will be worshiping you, not just playing songs. I pray for Joel as he brings the message that is on his heart for us to hear.
According to Martinez, those results are an incentive for the health workers to attend the May Day march on Tuesday.
“$3 off coupons? What are you talking about lady?!”
My favourite comment on this video comes from Geminii27: "I think there﻿ was a real scene shot once in 1878..."
12 ounces whipped topping
There was another pause, and I held the orange, still extended, between us.
We decided to put a wall of bookshelves in my office, so it would sort of feel like a library. We already had two white Billy bookshelves from IKEA, so we bought two more for $50 each, and then eight $10 extender shelves, so that the shelves would go up really high. I wish we could have gone all the way up to the ceiling for the true 'built-in' look, but the rafters in our loft made it tricky.
Use a rolling pin to whatever thickness you need and press the cookie cutter into the fondant. Refrigerate the design on parchment paper and add to the cake later with a bit of buttercream icing.
Ever feel attacked or persecuted when you’ve shared your opposing views on the LGBT movement?
Depending on the age of your students and the amount of time you are wanting to spend on the activity you may choose to cut the piece out yourself or have your students cut them. In my case I cut out the red and yellow circles and drew the lines on the yellow circle.
* Follow Me and easy lunch boxes on Twitter and Tweet This....(2 entries)
In contrast, a mature Rose-breasted grosbeak weighs in at about 21 cents. You get the picture!
Coconut and sweetened condensed milk also appear throughout shops, making a great snack if you've still got space for one (does anybody ever not? Or am I alone in thinking a meal is never actually over until you've had a couple snacks afterward?). Sinking your teeth into the smooth ball of sweetness and feeling the crunchy texture of the coconut is reason enough to head back over there and get a second one.
Everyday survival awareness is something that eveyone should pay particular attention to as they go about their daily routines. Your life can be altered or ended tragically when errors you make combined with proximity to a thug result in severe personal consequences. You do lock your doors in your car when your driving right….if not do it now. You do lock your doors and windows when you leave the house or go to sleep….if not do it now. You do avoid going to ATM’s alone at night in less than ideal areas….if you don’t then start avoiding those ATM’s today.
LUCKILY, I have someone doing the tough work for me – Pam from downtown is on the case. She has been in contact with Barnes and Noble and is determined to figure out the kink sand try to get these books onto my iPads before I need them – a couple of weeks away.
So yeah. I’m on a first name basis with a lot of librarians. Plus which I own tens of thousands of pages of books.
The few friends I’ve shared my dreams with agree that they aren’t “norm” dreams.
RECENTLY, my students participated in a Revolutionary War simulation as part of their Language and Literacy Unit called America in Conflict. They had to assume a personality and then participate throughout the unit by writing diary entries as that person. As a final piece, students were asked to write a biopoem from the perspective of their character. Of course, I took this as an opportunity for students to create a more polished version on the iPads. Here are some of the final versions.
Are proud to add “Death Eater” to their name;
The work quota that prisoners were expected to accomplish was totally unreasonable, but they were liable for serious punishment for any failure to fulfil it.
However, there are also a lot of other things going on, including two half-scetched romantic plot lines. I wish they'd made a decision on one or the other - either would have worked just fine, but the desire to include both feels half-assed - seventeen-year old boys aren't exactly going to line up for a movie about inter-creature relationships, in any case. I did like how that instead of starting from scratch, like many action and fantasy sequels do when it comes to romance, Del Toro took Hellboy and Liz (Selma Blair) to a new stage of their relationship. Unfortunately, now that she's got a handle on her powers, Liz doesn't have much to do except look exasperated with Hellboy for being kind of a crappy boyfriend, and Blair looks pretty depressed throughout. It's a bummer that the filmmakers couldn't come up with some better female story arcs, but at least they managed to fit in a Barry Manilow duet. Which is not to be missed.
8. Kenny Rankin - In the Name of Love
A Laher mothership was destroyed offshore from Chiapas, Mexico, before it was able to launch an attack on Mexico that would have ignited the San Andreas Fault, causing a 9.5 up through Mexico and into San Diego, Los Angeles, and San Francisco.
E – Extend: It was found in a survey that 3 out of 5 people are willing to attend a church if invited. In other words, people are not going to churches because no one invites them.
Shoes/socks/bow
I have not seen a statement from the government of Nigerian President Goodluck Jonathan on Ibori’s conviction. The current Delta State government has said it considers the conviction a private matter for Ibori.
Title Of Album: Gump & Friends EP
I was told it was more than likely fibroid tumors and that it would be a simple removal of them and that would be that. When I returned to the clinic to see the doctor again, he was so sure it was going to be uterine fibroids, he actually asked me to take part in a study.
BLITZER: But if you make a serious accusation against Governor Romney like that, you need to explain that.
I took this pan to my mom's house for Sunday Dinner and it was pretty much licked clean when I left. I was a little worried about how the apples would turn out because I have never eaten or cooked with them before, but my family assured me as they wolfed down their share that it was delicious.
In some parts of Alberta, the prairies stretch out, flat and almost featureless in all directions.
Those lovely people at MyMemories.com contacted me earlier this year and offered me the chance to play with their best-selling digital scrapbooking software program – My Memories Suite – then version 2.0. In return, all I have to do is host a giveaway on my blog – my pleasure!
Now, I can laugh at most of TREK’s silly plot burps, but this one is just lazy writing – No one ever tells Kirk that by accepting the challenge, he’s agreeing to fight Spock to the death. I mean, come the frack on. It’s so stupid. They tell him 82 times he can back out without losing honor if he wants, so they know he doesn’t know the rules of the ceremony, but then they don’t tell him this is to the death? Or eventually act like, “Ha-ha! Got you, you stupid Starfleet pig!”
That a spate of these reports is coming out just a couple of weeks after Prime Minister Binyamin Netanyahu met Obama in the White House shows that despite the smiles and the talk then about understanding and hyper-close coordination, the US and Israel are not seeing eye-to-eye on the Iranian “military option” issue.
So as much as I preach and other fire service sites preach about being dedicated to the job, you must have balance as well. Part of the reason you have to be dedicated to the job, train, work out and eat better is so when you get the chance to have that family time you are around for it. You will get ZERO or shortened time with your family if you die, or have a catastrophic injury on the job. Your actions impact your family, this job is dangerous and if you’re not trained, or in shape the family time will suffer even more. One of the reasons my wife is so understanding with the “extras” I do is because she knows those “extras” are so that I can be better at my job and come home at 0700 the day after a shift.
And in the morning stayed in bed all day
Readers should note these are not our views, but those of 20-30 corporate customers we've been speaking to. Most of them we'd agree with, they are simply common sense.
On the internet there was talk of asequel to Guest House Paradiso, is that on the cards?
Remove items from burners at the first hint of shaking, and turn off any burners and the oven—especially if you have a gas range. If you are standing near overhead cabinets or the refrigerator, move as far away as you can. Drop, cover your head and neck with your hands and arms, and wait until the shaking stops. If possible, grab something to protect your head better (even a baking sheet or a sturdy frying pan), since it’s likely that glass dishes, heavy canned food items, knives, or other dangerous items could
Happy Thursday . . . and welcome, once again, to my little corner of the world! Before I show you my card for this week, I just want to take a few moments to thank you for your kind words and "get well" wishes. This goofy cold I thought I had actually turned into something more than a cold . . . Pertussis (a.k.a. "whooping cough), Influenza, Pneumonia (which I probably caught from Paola in South Africa! hehehe!) . . . or some crazy-weird exotic respiratory something or other that I picked up in Las Vegas! I don't know, of course, because I avoid doctors like the plague! LOL! Seriously, who needs doctors when we have the internet! hehehe!
So there it is. A baby step. Whether you 'add-in' a whole grain (oatmeal) or eat a breakfast of fresh healthy seeds, or whether you grab onto the idea to make this simple breakfast all week for the life-on-the-go. Some more simple and healthy breakfast recipes: Hemp Berry Smoothie, Quinoa-Millet- Kasha Porridge, Raw Breakfast Muesli.
What books are eligible for the Edgar Awards Reading Challenge?
7. My Wave
Now here’s when it truly becomes personal, becomes real. The moment you and I trust completely that God can. That God has a plan. And that God can change the heart of any woman or man. But guess what…you’re first. You’re going to be the first…to rely totally on God and His plans for YOU. Not your spouse.
Daily he had lied to himself that opening up to the power of the bodily pump would finally make him whole, teach him how to feel, not again, just feel. From birth he had been taught about Irish pride, he had been taught about life and death, he had been taught about sorrow and despair, no one had taught him about love, not even his mother, and being a single child made it worse, he could not fathom feeling; he did not know that it existed. He wandered the streets, drinking in the alleys always drunk out of his mind because of a sight he had seen in a picture once, only once, he had seen a glint in the actor’s eye, a glint that only came on, shown through only when the damsel in the picture was in the frame. The glint confused him, it sickened him, it made him wish for the unknown, it made him wish for love.
My interpretation:
Abenobashi Magical Shopping Street
There is a greater force than the human mind. Some intelligence had to create the human mind so that is the power I trust in. I trust in the power that makes the sun shine. I trust in the power that makes the rain fall, supplies the air I breathe, and power that keeps my heart beating. There is a beautiful and mysterious energy that sustains life. This energy, call it what you want, wants your full and total trust. You have to trust with your heart not your mind. Mind wants logic and it wants things to “make sense.” Only your heart can trust. You have to be like a small child that trusts their parents. YOU can relax……if you trust. That is the basis of spiritual surrender, knowing that you don’t have the whole picture but trusting that this power God, Creative Intelligence, Universe has the full perspective and that what this energy brings you is exactly what you need, when you need it, even if you cannot see at the time that it is for your good. This knowing can be a source of comfort during difficult times.
A press statement issued by the Press Information Department (PID) of Pakistan said the Cabinet considered and directed the Commerce Ministry to consult all stakeholders before the preparation and finalisation of the negative and positive lists for trade with India.
Garnish with some chopped spring onion.
Taobao does have an online payment platform called Alipay, but I think it's only limited in China, so that's out of question. Taobao does not directly accept from PayPal, so you need an agent who can buy the stuff for you and you pay through PayPal to your agent.
Contact WritingWebinars@fwmedia.com
It could be worse for the Blue Jackets.
My Husband is a grad student and we were hoping that after 3 more quick years we would finally be able to settle down somewhere, he'd get an amazing job, we'd buy a house and give our kids the kind of life we really want them to have. And now we are not sure how that will all work out.
It resembled an overlong Calvin Klein perfume ad that no one asked for. Or an extended segment of Paris je t'aime that no one wanted. If you can imagine a third-rate homage of not just a Jean-Luc Godard film, but – worse than that – the “essence" of a Jean-Luc Godard film, then this is the film for you. I’d have been left comatose by director Michael Polish’s unbearable pastiche had I not been constantly wriggling in my seat desperate for it to end. Lovers in bed. Lovers on a beach. Lovers on mopeds. It was excruciating: one draining scene of internalised longing and woe after another. It’s love story as art-directed hipness: for posers only - so, like most scent ads with a passing knowledge of the French New Wave, then. However, recast it with zombies...
When I say I am a food writer the conversation usually turns to “Have you tried this? What would you recommend for this? You have to go here!”
Anansi Boys, Coraline, et al. – Gaiman
IN A WORD: Lagging.
If none of the ideas cheer me up, no one wins.
Bring the butter, cocoa powder, and milk to a low boil. Remove from heat. Stir in the powdered sugar, then the vanilla. Pour over the warm cake and spread. Sprinkle with chopped pecans, if desired.
The most fearful fled to foreign countries in a phenomenon called “brain drain”, for good work and decent living conditions. If you kept your head down and worked hard, your children could have a better future as citizens of a free country. We were blamed as the intelligentsia that failed the country, and the young ones were not allowed to ask what the country did for them, only what they could do for the country.
Fifteen-year-old Isabelle Scott loves her life by the boardwalk on the supposed wrong side of the tracks in North Carolina. But when tragedy strikes, a social worker sends her to live with a long-lost uncle and his preppy privileged family. Isabelle is taken away from everything she's ever known, and, unfortunately, inserting her into the glamorous lifestyle of Emerald Cove doesn't go so well. Her cousin Mirabelle Monroe isn't thrilled to share her life with an outsider, and, in addition to dealing with all the rumors and backstabbing that lurk beneath their classmates' Southern charm, a secret is unfolding that will change both girls' lives forever.
In that respect our relationship with money is no different than our relationship with people. Much of the difficulty is due to our limited understanding of money as such and hence a tendency to approach money as merely "a thing". A thing that we earn and then use to buy other things, or a thing that we use to fulfill our needs, physical, emotional, mental and spiritual, including the need for safety and freedom.
Flaked Oats - 3.8%
and the wheels goin' 'round
Can I use your fabric, made by Moda, to create things and sell them without your approval? What about selling things on Etsy?
So, I called the dealer and he said he would bring my beautiful vintage door back with him
CISPA = Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act
Then there are the teachers who show up in your life and lead by example. I have all kinds of those too. The ones who stand out the most are my ex-Mother-in-Law. Suz died this year and it was much harder than I expected because I owe so much to her. She had an incredible ability to find something nice to say about everyone. She could be sincere and gracious in the most difficult situations. I worked with her for a year and watched her deal with customers this way. She was amazing. She also had the ability to give you her full attention when you were talking with her. These are talents I’m sorely lacking. Any skill I have at all in these areas I got from watching her.
I've been a little disorganized this week, seeing as it's the first week back to school for the kids, and we're all getting used to our new schedule. I was hoping to debut all of the great new weekly features I've been dreaming up all summer, but it looks like I might need to just start small!
The National Capital Commission runs the park and has been meeting daily with police.
Recently, we have been having issues with Isaac acting out physically towards his sisters. It's typically a smack or a pinch, but there have been incidents of biting as well.
We're super excited that the fantastic Susana's Custom Art & Card Design Design Team are joining us for this hop! Susana is a good friend of Elaine's and SCACD has become like an international sister store to Quixotic Paperie! We're collaborating on some crafty adventures, and hopefully this is the first of many!
Voce Vai Ver (You`ll See) 02:56
But what hath Murdoch wrought on Barron's?
Honey, it's getting late and I've got to go to bed before my second shift at Home Depot. I talked to Marvin and he said he was feeling well enough to drive to St Paul tomorrow and wire you the money. I just need the info again. I don't know how to work this new email they set me up with at the elderly services center. We all love you.
Back to our regularly scheduled programming.... tomorrow...
Truth for the Adoptees.
The hard drive was backed up and reformatted and a fresh dual boot install of windows XP x 32 and windows 7 x 64 done. This took about 1 hour, rather slow I felt. Office 2007, Adobe Master Colection CS5 and Visual Studio were then installed. Amcap was installed to run the webcam as the Dell webcam software has been an issue for complaint.
The practical side of her mind told her to never leave him alone again. The surreal portion of her brain was still trying to decipher what Morris meant as he continued to recite a horrifying chant.
They were all charged with a number of robbery and assault offences. The alleged robbery included racist taunts.
Tools that are known by different terms around the world, floor area ratio, floorspace index, floor lot ratio, plot ratio; despite subtle differences are all essentially the same – a tool that controls ‘Bulk Zoning’ that is the bulk of development on a plot and across a zone. Floorspace Area Ratio (FAR) is the most common term, and is therefore used here as it makes international comparisons easier. This essay looks at the strengths and weaknesses of FAR and in particular how its use can be improved in the MENA (Middle East North Africa) Region.
Still ... .. the dress is not finished:
What was the first story you remember writing?
It'll take me a while to finish, but I could teach some classes once I have 18 hours under my belt. It's a growing university and an inventive (also growing) program, so there's no telling what I could end up doing. It's part of a cool, new journey and I'm excited about it.
So when I stepped into the only open register lane, I was not intending to catch the eye of a cute, new, coed register employee. I mean, this is the grocery store of yuppies, after all. The female employees are always, if nothing else, attractively kempt. We just quickly looked each other in the eyes and smiled, and she went back to the customer at hand.
This is as close to love as I can describe it. People often ask what real love feels like. I would say it is different, for everyone. But I will do my best to describe it, in the simplest relatable way I can:
17.) Sex and the City
These are some shots of the interior of our soon to be new house. Amy says I can't have deer heads though.
Professor Bob Rowbotham in the London Sunday Telegraph of 2 July 2006, referred to the motives of the elites, who were creating what Marx called “A reserve army of labour.”
Second attempt to post
I found the early chapters informative and reassuring. Kind of like when a friend's toddler has blowout tantrum in front of you and you are relieved to know that it happens to other moms, too. Honestly, I wanted to hug Kessler at times, which is maybe why I trusted that her intentions were good, that she truly set out to be more Margaret Mead than Mommy Dearest.
These colorful locks seem to be all the rage. Whether it’s highlights, whole head, or just tips bright bold colors are in! This is a great look for those who dare to be bold. I love this trend because it’s being fun while being stylish and chic, not goth or scene. If your not set on dying your whole head try dip dying or ombre with semi-permenant colors. If you add some conditioner to the color of your choice you’ll get a soft pastel color!
It was rainy and I was ruminating and marinating of thoughts on my mind and I could have curled up at home but no my friends, NYC called as did my wonderful new friend Andrea. Andrea and I met in true NY fashion when I was hosting trivia night and her boyfriend brought her along and we just CLICKED. Clicked in a way I haven't just clicked in a while with someone, like legos when they finally snap into place. Snap! Ah, yes, that feels right. Thus began a delightful fizzy beginning of a long string of romantic friend dates (picnics on the hudson, mojitos in Brazilian gardens, etc) which greatly confuse her boyfriend.
Saturday - the kids sort their laundry, and I sort mine and my husbands.
Del Rey, Lester. Illustrated by Heugh, James. Rockets Through Space: The Story of Man's Preparations to Explore the Universe. New York: John C. Winston Co. (118 p.) 26 cm. (1957)
Gavin Hepburn is a true psychic but as yet is untested. When he locks eyes with a beautiful stranger Gavin knows he’s found his quarry—the woman he’s destined to save.
1 sharpness
Kerry Minnear with Gentle Giant — “Peel The Paint”
Antonio wins with a Gutwrench Suplex. They need to give the move a name, Booker T doesn’t even know what the move is. (Despite being in the business for over 20 years).
Okay, I am anal. I think about these things. Fortunately, I think about them more in 2010 than I did in 1984, so I have a lot of fond nostalgia to make up for some of the logical issues.
William Feehan, 72, New York, N.Y.
“I am walking proof of the power of prayer. For 78 minutes I was dead and even if I lived was expected to have suffered brain damage.
2 -4mm 3D Mounting Squares
Hope this finds you taking 15 minutes to do whatever the hell makes you happy today.
And bring your family! This is one of the best family-oriented beer events around, and your young children will be excited to see real goats right up close (and probably laugh out loud at the inevitable caprine antics that ensue). The crowd is very mellow, and stupid behavior is not only rare, it's usually taken care of by the other attendees; as it should be.
GRENADE ATTACK: Attack army men with water balloons.
15. What did you get really, really, really excited about?
Time to do something different!
Bad iPhone photo but you kind of get the idea. We didn't stay late at the party but we did meet a nice couple who recommended a restaurant to us - Raoul's - which was excellent. The food was very good and I had an absinthe as my pre-dinner cocktail. I recommend the asparagus/quinoa appetizer.
Summation: Short walk, again not visible at street level from courthouse (hidden between two skyscrapers!). Exit the courthouse on the 4th floor (Grand Ave), walk towards Disney Concert Hall, and keep going on grand until you pass the Wells Fargo Center on the same side of the street. The entrance to "The Court" will be just past the first Wells Fargo Center building, to your right at the far end of the plaza. Relatively broad range of marketplace and sit-down options and nice atrium setting. Check out Taipan for table-service, decent Chinese food without trekking to Chinatown.
Shared a few photos that I took the other day from my visit to the Dallas Arboretum to see the Dale Chihuly Glass art exhibit, and wanted to share a few more today with you.
Obviously then I thought it must not be alien. What are – after all, when you think about it – the chances of something that looks alien actually being alien.
The G-Spot and the Blended Orgasm Stimulating the G-spot is also a great complement to oral stimulation. When your partner is working your clitoris with his mouth, have him insert one or two fingers into your vagina with a gentle thrusting motion. If he tilts them upward slightly, he is likely to hit your G-spot and bring about some intense sensations that may ultimately result in a combined clitoral and vaginal orgasm — and even ejaculation.
Roderick Russsell
Now that's not to say that I don't read and love other genres too. I'm quite a fan of fantasy and I'm falling more and more in love with contemporary with each novel I read.
I warned Jen that I would need help at the baggage claim to get our bag and 2 car seats. She called just as we were landing to say that she was there. Once I got to baggage claim and couldn't see her, I called to make sure we were at the same baggage claim. After a little investigating we discovered that she was at the wrong airport! I flew into Oakland and she was in San Jose. Haha! Luckily there was a volleyball team that helped me get my luggage and find a bench to sit and wait.
Of course you can, the voices whispered deviously.
Maurice Tabard (1 gelatin silver print, 1929)
I headed up a rickety staircase that was seemingly held together by duct tape to change into my Gi. We were required to bring the Gi’s to the Dojo and change there because it is a great insult to wear one’s Gi outside of the Dojo. Sensei Frank told us that we would bring great dishonor on our families by changing at home, and the class, after taking a collective gulp, realized that by dishonor he meant a good ol’ fashioned beat down, courtesy of Sensei Frank.
S: The rescue is in need of supplies and hay for winter. If you would like to help feed the animals, please visit our website and sponsor one of the animals. You can virtually 'adopt/sponsor' one of the animals of your choice for a gift of $10, or more if possible (although we accept donations of any denomination....even a gift of one dollar is much appreciated!) Every cent of your gift is used towards purchasing the animals’ food, supplies and any vetting. To see the animals you can 'adopt' or sponsor, go to the "Adopt one of the Goats" or "Adopt one of the Cats" page, or just 'Feed the Dog'.
1. Vanilla Crème Brulèe Insert
The kids have loved the time to play all these games together but it sure is cold in the church with the heat turned down. We took a thermometer into the youth room and it was 48 degrees in there. It's hard to believe we survived cold like that throughout the winter time in Uruguay.
Dare to enter a world where the dead walk free. Where danger and desire lurk around every corner. And where women find lust and love with women.
The figure of the shepherd is allegorical.
My head on a tornados path, for all destruction
It's been busy month, with me leaving one job and starting a new job tomorrow. This month has also seem a transition in my Dark Eldar, they have gone from the nicer list I took to my last tournament Vanquish to a more toned list that will be ready to complete with the more cut throat tournaments I will be attending later in the year, the first of which being Rapid Strike in Reading.
5½ hours talk time and up to 250 hours standby time
This is where run ins with salesmen are just horrible for me. I don’t trust any of them because of the experiences I have had with them and yet, I can’t mistreat them. My mother didn’t take garbage off of anyone and my father was the opposite. I am most like my father in this way, but it took a salesman for me to see a side of my father I did not know existed.
I am loving tabata workouts. They are so quick and effective and leave me so freakin sore the next day!
Hold fast
I have made a few Christmas cards with the poinsettia, I've been experimenting with various designs so I'll get them finished and take pictures of them and post them up in the next few day. That's all for today. Bye for now.
1. No sugar in the house, but anything outside of the house is fine.
This year the weather wasn’t very cooperative, wet and cold the first 3 days so we took in some lectures. Lou Seipel was the speaker for the week we were there and her topic was Bridges out of Poverty. She was a very dynamic speaker and interesting. Like everything else, communication is key to helping. We can’t fix but we can learn how to help by learning to communicate. If you’re interested, there is a website, www.ahaprocess.com.
only a few of them will really miss you, only a few really want to look in your eyes until the very last moment, and say goodbye with a smile. those are the ones whose memory will keep you company when you’ll be sad or bored; those are the ones you’ll want to meet, once back, to share not your travel stories, but your travel emotions with.
After completing my tag I stamped a coordinating kraft gift bag. I simply took the globe image and stamped it repeatedly with kraft ink. (My apologies for the differences in colour between the tag and bag images but they were both shot with different lighting conditions).
DYLAN BAKER (Happiness)
I have noticed that this type of activity does go on.
Companies including SAIC, a huge defence contractor, Lockheed Martin, AT&T and Time Warner Cable have lobbied for the bill and contributed funds to the political action committee of Mike Rogers, the bill’s sponsor.
SO...I'm kickin' back, hoping that my back gets better soon and until then, I'll be checking out the Flickr group looking at all of your photos. This has been SO much fun to see what everyone is doing!!!
Second, I wanted to make it clear that I am not against taking medication for depression, panic disorder, or anxiety. I still take .25 mg of alprazolam when needed. If I'm in a crisis or just coming out of one, or if my thyroid starts acting up as it has recently, then I may need to take it once a day or more often for awhile until things settle down. After the dust has settled, I usually do not need to take it at all.
Today, the struggle between debtor and creditor pits the United States — the world’s largest debtor nation — against rising superpower China. With more than $15 trillion in outstanding public debt, Uncle Sam is in hock to China to the tune of a cool …
The difficulty with marketing like this is that there is no accurate method of working out how each avenue performs. One things for certain though, and that’s that the number of jobs coming in has risen twofold since November when we started. Granted, many of these are small and not very profitable but its achieving the aim of widening the customer base.
was: $7.99
This makes me think of these verses in I Timothy 6:17-19: Command those who are rich in this present world not to be arrogant nor to put their hope in wealth, which is so uncertain, but to put their hope in God, who richly provides us with everything for our enjoyment. Command them to do good, to be rich in good deeds, and to be generous and willing to share. In this way they will lay up treasure for themselves as a firm foundation for the coming age, so that they may take hold of the life that is truly life.
Right now, I am sitting in an office chair with my feet pulled up off the floor. It is a slightly awkward way to be sitting while I’m typing—but as I’ve been at my desk for the past couple of hours preparing to write, I’ve felt a stinging sensation on my feet four or five times. The first couple of times, I pulled my bare feet out from under my desk and looked at my toes, where I felt the ‘needle prick’. I didn’t see anything, so I went back to searching for scriptures on my computer. A little later, I felt it again! I quickly pushed my chair back and saw an ant on my foot. I brushed it away and squashed it. I went and got some spray cleaning liquid and paper towels. I did a thorough cleaning of the area under the desk. I expected to see some crumbs or something that had fallen on the floor. I did find a couple more ants—but no food of any kind.
Over the past two years, more than 1.17million new profiles have been added to the database but the number of DNA-related detections fell from a peak of 41,148 in 2006-07 to 31,915 in 2008-09.
The tenanted model of Punch and Enterprise appears flawed for any number of reasons though the high leverage adopted isn’t really the issue that many think. All capital costs money, whether it is debt or equity. The business has to service both with either interest or dividends. Leverage requires interest payments where equity can halt dividend payments making an equity capital structure more resilient to a temporary downturn. Neither capital structure is resilient to a permanent downturn in trading conditions as who really wants to own equity that eats itself rather than offers a return?
If you have gone to Yahoo! Mail in the past six months, then you've seen those insipid pictures that Yahoo! put up to advertise their picture mail feature. Everytime I see them, I have to make fun of them. So, here are some of the pics and the things that come to my mind when I see them. Feel free to add your own comments.
Alas the “camel” was supposed to have a camel’s head. It was supposed to be but then…..blah blah blah – happened.
It did link to the NYPIRG chart reproduced above, which includes Forest City Ratner.
sugar 5 tbsp
This was an amendment to his original order that only contained the word "incitement" and formed part of a judgment that dismissed an attempt by the ANC to intervene in the matter and appeal his order.
“Render therefore unto Caesar the things which are Caesar’s; and unto God the things that are God’s.”
dark green work pants, plaid shirt, suspenders, engineer cap on grandpa
The Wall Street bankster Bernard Madoff reportedly agreed last month to a permanent freeze on his assets without admitting or denying fraud charges in a civil case against him, Reuters reported a U.S. regulator as saying .
In the mean time, a newer pilot approached me with some questions about competing and suggested I put on a course for those like him who had no idea what it was all about. He offered up a meeting room at his worksite and voila! About a dozen pilots attended, were really supportive of my idea of continuing to teach classes and courses and a handful asked about the intermediate coaching program they saw on my website.
On their way back they were attacked by two Arab youths, who stabbed them, she said. She succeeded in escaping their clutches, and made her way to a nearby road where, bleeding profusely, she sought help.
Based on our extensive documents and insider information, Sarawak Report is able to confirm that the money pouring into Michael Chia’s accounts were the proceeds of timber corruption and that the young man was acting as the collecting agent for kickbacks for concessions, granted by Musa Aman in his capacity as Chairman of the Board of Yayasan Sabah.
Thirteen.org has sent word of a new online, mini-documentary series they launched this week, called “New York on the Clock.”
I know what i want. I know what i’m fighting for, everyday.
I remain hopeful that I can kick this virus and return to a more stable level of health, so that I can experience the impending wonders of peri-menopause with a bit more ease. (I'm reading a fascinating book by master herbalist Susun Weed about menopause as the death of the maiden/mother stage and the flowering of the wise woman/crone. I can't say I feel in the least bit like I'm ready for the crone title, but I do like the idea of becoming a Wise Woman.)
I’ve got my back to him now, I’m walking away and I hear him fall onto his backside. He groans, as much in frustration as self-pity.
What is everyone up to this weekend? TGIF! xoxo.
This movie was cool for me, just that there is too many advertise sponsored brand in this movie, example: Nippon, Proton, Insurance and etc. This is abit too much and not necessary to do it. My rating would be 6.5/10 and it is a fine movie, that's it.
He said property owners had lives and families and were not trying to make someone else suffer financially. NZPA
I just got through the last 20 minutes of reliving March 4 over and over again in my head. It just came on suddenly and there was nothing I could do... finally I found something completely unrelated to get kind of angry about and that helped.
Two of the more unusual beers were from New Glarus: 1) Raspberry Tart and 2) Wisconsin Belgian Red. I had picked these up on a summer day trip with my daughter from the Twin Cities to a pizza farm in Wisconsin (no, they don’t farm pizzas – but rather make them with fresh ingredients they raise). I found these bottles in a gift shop located in the tiny town of Stockholm, WI (pop. 100) and brought them back to Japan. The Raspberry Tart offered a strong pie-like and jam aroma. It blended sweetness and tartness unlike any beer I’ve ever had. In fact, Lefty commented that it was really not at all like beer. The Wisconsin Belgian Red was redolent of cherry cough drops with touches of menthol, pomegranate, and cinnamon. Lefty found it reminiscent of a Kriek. Again, not quite like a beer, but truly delicious.
In the midst of preparing for the work week, I did manage to find a few moments to get some crafting in! I decided to try something that I've not done before and I was so extremely happy with the turn out.
a happy morning here..today is my anniversary..oops!i mean ours :0)
~ Clarity and comfort with my mistakes in life.
No answer, only the swish
“You Shall Need a Knight… “TWO KNIGHTS!!” the Voice corrects itself
That is exactly how I would describe the beginning of my week. There was so much anticipation and waiting that when it finally arrived I could think of nothing else. Plus, there was unwrapping involved. That’s right- my first Birchbox arrived!! It was everything that I imagined it would be. The next day my husband’s Birchbox arrived too- before you give him a hard time I signed him up for it. I’m such a good wife (most of the time). I tried to get him to appear on this video, but he was a tad shy. However, there are a couple cute faces that make a cameo. Bonus points if you know their names.
Are you ready!
"Well, then, the child found in the adult."
We are talking about the future (that’s why this form of conditional is also called Future Real Conditional). We are thinking about a particular condition or situation in the future, and the result of this condition. There is a real possibility that this condition will happen.
The sky above Manhattan will once again be a canvas on which the most popular characters in the world take flight on Thanksgiving Day. Since 1927 when Felix the Cat was first inflated and added to the procession, the Parade’s giant character balloons have wowed generations with their high-flying bigger-than-life proportions. Joining the lineup of iconic characters this year are two new helium giants, Diary of A Wimpy Kid and Kung Fu Panda™.
Today my lovely new washing machine was delivered by some very smiley John Lewis van men. Their smiles were soon wiped off their faces when they saw the machine they were taking away. My old Dyson, huge, heavy, beautifully purple, clashed nicely with their red faces as they hauled it out over the steps and onto the trolley to be heaved into the darkness of their van. They said Dyson washing machines were their absolute nightmare, especially if the place they were removing it from was upstairs in a tenement building.
If this theory is correct then I should have at least one newly mated queen so the old queen should be leading a swarm out soon.
Resist resist resist! Marines don't spook easy is so obvious it's like saying humans breathe air. The opposite might be interesting "Marines spook easy" but what you've got here is a yawn.
Currently out of print, this super group was sorely overlooked in the history books. Featuring Stiv Bators backed by Sham69 .
Using Inexpensive Vases to Improve Your Home
First impressions are really important in life. Don’t name your kid Rain Mann…. or Ima Horr….. or Luke Skye Walker… or Emma Roid….Fanny Whiffer…..or Holly Wood….or Candy Kaine……or Brock Lee….or Roxanne Gravel….
7/10 for The Hunger Games!
Moon sped back in towards the sea front, his mind was racing! Both Shag and Kelly had taken out a rocker! WOW!!
The man formally known as Ron Artest, Lakers forward Metta World Peace, was kicked out of yesterday’s game with Oklahoma City after throwing an elbow. At least he didn’t climb into the stands and punch any fans this time.
I'm trying out a little bit of a new format: a more detailed menu plan for the weekdays, less detailed for the weekend. I think this will help to make sure we eat the fresh produce at a good pace (so that is lasts us several days, but before it spoils).
Thanks for all your comments on my last blog post and suggestions for my ginger syrup, what fantastic ideas!
Nowadays, it seems many writers and bloggers read more to respond than to consider.
If I had my way she would have been more than sacked… I would of rammed the whole pack of dog biscuits down her throat, put her on a leash then dragged her into the kennel where she clearly belongs! What kind of a person would do such a thing?
It is amazing what you can do if you give yourself the time. However, in all of that, I didn’t want to cook. The thought of creating a meal exhausted me. I avoided my recipe books. I barely looked at recipes online. I began to sympathize with those who hate cooking.
Yesterday afternoon whilst playing with my new(ish) Panasonic Lumix camera I discovered a macro setting and had fun playing with that for an hour. Results aren't great yet...but I'll keep practising! (DH keeps saying 'read the instruction manual!' but I'd rather find out by playing and fiddling. Anyone else like me? ( I HATE manuals)
Embracing life like a fairy tale enables us to recapture a child-like sense of astonishment. It helps us to remember that this world, though fallen, is indeed an amazing and wondrous place. The fairy tale mindset makes us grateful, because it reminds us that all the beauty of this world is an undeserved gift. The story is precious because it might have been told quite differently. God did not need to write our character into his world, but he chose to. Like a fairy tale, this world is often hostile as well as beautiful; however, God’s word assures us that our adventures in this world are not in vain, and that there is an even greater adventure yet to come.
Dr Ruth Vine said Professor George signed the petition "in his capacity as a private citizen", therefore he had not breached the code of conduct for public sector employees.
Mitch: Nice.
The recent Tesco 4 for £6 offer has led me to buy more bottles of White Shield than I would normally do. This is a classic beer and one for which, despite recent travails and brewery moves, I still have a lingering affection. It still always seems a touch sweet, though, when I remember it from its glory days of the 1980s as a distinctively, even aggressively, dry beer.
Jim Beam has named Kimberley Bennett as Director of the Jim Beam Heritage Center, the new visitors' experience at Beam's Clermont, Kentucky, distillery that is slated to open this fall.
I have a few other "seasonals" to try. They stopped short of calling them an "Oktoberfest". But I know what they were trying to acheive. I'll give them a shot this weekend, and let youknow what I think.
James 5:16 Confess your faults one to another, and pray one for another, that ye may be healed. The effectual fervent prayer of a righteous man availeth much.
This week has been slow going, mainly because I'm hand quilting, FINALLY, the Tiggly Winks quilt.
Hope you enjoy! (I colored the lantern but for the life of me couldn't come up with an idea for a card. My creative brain has seemed to gone on vacation for the moment)
For this card, I stamped a base with a gorgeous floral image from the
Level 4: MP Cost: 10, Duration: 120 seconds, All Stats: +2%.
1 lb okra
thank you for becoming a part of my blogging community,
There is more in less. I have realized when you have finish in time or early usually you are more through with your content and text, rather than when you take time. It is usually the un settlement of the speaker and their lack of confidence in their content that makes then breeze around for longer and longer. Having said that, I have had long services, where I preached in time but then spent an hour praying for people as they respond.
Sadly a ghastly little man called Ken Livingstone, who I don’t think has ever been to the countryside, decided he would choose how country folk chose to enjoy themselves in their spare time. He tabled a bill in parliament and Politicians decided the pursuit of foxes, which are vermin remember, was more important to debate than the very important things happening in Britain at the time. The bill was eventually carried and hunting was banned in Britain.
5: To see how many finger-nail poems I can remember.
“And my speech and my preaching were not with persuasive words of human wisdom, but in demonstration of the Spirit and of power, that your faith should not be in the wisdom of men but in the power of God.” – 1 Corinthians 2:4-5
Secondly, and this is the part that gained most of the media attention, the whole getting sacked employees to train their new replacements is kind of stinge. Imagine it, seriously, having to regurgitate years of knowledge, spending hours with your usurper buzzing around you like a fly, asking questions and taking notes, in full knowledge that Westpac have not only pushed you off the plank. They’re making you dig your own grave… The folks apparently don’t like it so much. I can’t imagine why.
The consultation on the 'Strategic Framework for Welsh Language Services in Health, Social Services and Social Care' which is now closed can currently be viewed on the Welsh Government website.
Why doesn't random.org let you save the image of your random generated number? Oh well, you're going to have to trust me.
Poe’s story is, of course, ‘The Black Cat’, which was first published in 1843 in an edition of The Saturday Evening Post. As its Wikipedia entry rightly suggests, it is “a study of the psychology of guilt” in which “a murderer carefully conceals his crime and believes himself unassailable, but eventually breaks down and reveals himself, impelled by a nagging reminder of his guilt.” Because the narrator is unreliable, we cannot be certain whether the cat that returns is truly the cat he killed (Pluto) or whether it is simply another cat (which is really the more logical explanation). Whatever supernatural aspects the cat seems to possess are entirely attributed by the unhinged narrator, and yet the reader’s own awareness of the superstitions surrounding cats fuels their slight sliver of doubt and induces terror.
Genre – Crime fiction
Every year, in addition to the plethora of things I buy for my girl, I love spending some time creating a handmade gift for her. This year, when I was coloring up some of our FAVORITE images from Saturated Canary's Digi Shop, Paige practically swooned with excitement!!! She just loves Alice and her Wonderland Friends! I knew right then what I had to do :-)
My clumsy husband sat on my sunglasses the other day and obviously broke them - the fool. Sod's Law dictated that the sun would shine very brightly that day making my eyes stream. Luckily we headed into Bath and I went looking for some new sunnies.
Subsequently, my interest in Stirling rekindled, I very much enjoyed a ramble through Iqbal Aalam's Flickr images and notes on Stirling's work which renewed my resolve to see more of his buildings and particularly the (obvious but essential) Leicester Engineering Faculty.
Especially through divorce.
*considers asking Wiki founder for royalties for all the traffic she sends that way*
we met up with our friend Mr. Knight.
Perhaps I need to think this out a bit more and find some places which are more packed with people to watch and listen to. Hopefully one day they’ll make some sense to me.
I treasure my life these days. That’s because I have joy in what I do. I paint because it brings me joy…not because I need to meet a deadline or I have to achieve my quota before the weekend. I don’t paint for approval. For years, (more years than I care to remember) I set my alarm for four a.m. and rolled out of bed, painting with oils for three hours before the rest of the family got up. Most nights, after the dishes were done and the children were tucked into bed, I pulled out the canvases again…working sometimes until midnight. I carried on like that and raised children at the same time. (reading stories, carving pumpkins, making bunny cakes, sewing costumes, observing Advent, cooking meals)
Would Homer Simpson Really Love Canadian Health Care?
freaks me out because I honestly don't know how on earth we're going
For this post though, I will be talking about honesty from a hobby standpoint.
Being budget conscious, I am back onto making soups.
Now the legendary “Man dates” have to follow a set pattern. To prove that two blokes going for a drink alone are in no way gay for each other, there are only three topics of conversation that are allowed.
THE COMMISSION ON ELECTIONS, THE AUDITOR GENERAL and THE INSULAR TREASURER OF THE PHILIPPINES, respondents.
Also incorporated inside will be exhibits by the City of Dearborn, Ford Motor Co., The Henry Ford, Pure Michigan and others.
July 28th. It’s Independence day in Peru and Gloria’s birthday. Her family decides that we are going to the La Merced. The trip was a blast and we accomplished so much. Climbing waterfalls, cave exploring, hanging out with the Asháninka, and drinking the world’s best gourmet coffee in the world.
She let the irony hang there between us, and I could picture her in her wedding dress and without it. Then the first time we met in the university newsroom, big glasses and frilly blouse. Hair that smelled like the ocean and felt like silk. A sharp wit, infectious laugh, and the tenacity of a bloodhound on every story she covered. I thought we were always going to be on the same page, but somehow I kept chasing headlines and she moved to the Life section.
$500 sneakers for what?
What do i mean by bid? Well here’s where it gets really good for the designers. The bidders are non other that Macy’s, H&M and Sacks Fifth Avenue. Yeah you heard right. These stores are actually bidding on these new designs. Throughout the series the three store’s have a total of $6 million they can use in order to purchase the new designs. if the Designer receives a bidder then their item will be available for sale on the store website the same night and in most stores the next day. If the designer does not receive a single bid then they are up for elimination.
- Of course, its not always easy with long drives and early loads in's sometimes.
Oh the irony. haha
BING!
No, at its worst, because there’s NOTHING good that will ever come out of that kind of attitude.
Lataji is one blogger I always look upon and admire at. The way she gives every minute detail when making the dishes, her constant encouragement, and her immediate response to any queries only teach me how to be more perfect as a blogger! Here's something I tried from her kitchen and absolutely loved!
Our picture this week comes from the photographic archives of the State Library of Queensland, Australia and is entitled "Children enjoying a ride on the miniature railway at the Brisbane Ekka in 1948" The "Ekka" is the local name for the Brisbane Exhibition Grounds where exhibitions and other events have been held since the staging of the first Queensland Intercolonial Exhibition in 1876. Those Sepia Saturday participants who like a theme to follow can find prompts a-plenty in this image : trains, things in miniature, steam, days out and the ubiquitous hats of the age. Or you can ignore themes all together and just let us have an old image and some new thoughts. Whatever you decide to do, do it on or around Saturday the 5th May 2012, and then link your post to the list below.
“Is she hurt badly?” Mr. Bowen asked.
4-5 – ‘Mac’ by Harold Pinter (Fintan McKeown)
destinations
In love, and at loggerheads, they lie tortured and agonising under the insufferable weight of the unspoken.
Kim and I are helping out our friend Krafty Max with her Anniversary Giveaway. To enter you must follow us by email and post a comment below.
Concert- Free for those who take 3 workshops
The album should be available for download –on iTunes, Amazon, etc – a few days before the actual CD is released. Probably early next week.
A little while later we were finishing dinner. Michael had changed into a long sleeved blue shirt before dinner, and we talked about how he was about to finish his pie. But you're not in your holy shirt!
Well known radio and television broadcaster Chris Evans has become embroiled in a " so called" race row after seemingly innocent remarks made on the One Show last Friday.
Possible: Sound Editing, Visual Effects; Long Shot: Sound Mixing
There are several explanations that would be consistent with the witness of Scripture. First, it could be that those who witness such an apparition are simply mistaken. There might be natural phenomena that can explain what they see. Or perhaps they are grieving and miss a loved one so much that they experience his/her presence in some way.
I kept this very flat, as this friend is like I... and prefers her books to be in good order, no bumps in the pages thanks!!!
- Plays a key role in skin protection and DNA repair
The biggest crime Super Mario 3D Land commits is that nothing feels connected. It has a world map, but the levels often have little or nothing to do with the theme of any given area. Back to Vanilla Dome, the designers knew it was supposed to be a cave-like environment and ran with it the whole way through, imagine if the Forest of Illusion all of a sudden took you to a series of completely unrelated levels where you’re running around on rotating blocks ala Super Mario Sunshine then thrust in some other obstacle course with elements of former Mario games. The throwbacks are nice, but they far outweigh the amount of original material in 3D land. They even squeeze in a level that makes a nod to classic Zelda dungeons. It would be more endearing if the constant nods to previous games were accompaniment to new material instead of the bulk of the game.
More than 2,000 people were sacked from their jobs in connection with the protests.
distressing
There’s no room for a microSD slot; instead there’s only a port for the SIM to fit into. Rather like the HTC One X, the Dev Alpha has a tray for the micro SIM to keep the lines of the case sleek and stylish; unlike the Lumia it doesn’t come with a special tool to get it open – you can just use a paperclip.
About Independence Brewing Co.
GSM interworking unit (GIWU):
During the last act of both films, each Terminator sent to kill chases our heroes with a motorcycle (if briefly).
Day 1: Peace (a spot of embroidery after the little one is in bed)
TV Licence - £10
Erm, except for when the features aren't really developed beyond the level of a checklist item.
to the Tootsie Roll center of a Tootsie Pop? I never made it without biting, ask Mr. Owl. Mr. Owl, how many licks does it take to get to the Tootsie Roll center of a Tootsie Pop? Let's find out. One… Two-whoooo… Three. CRUNCH! Three. How many licks does it take to get to the Tootsie Roll center of a Tootsie Pop? CRUNCH! The world may never know. P.S.: My favourite flavours are orange and chocolate.
Hello My Dear Bloggie Friends! I have to be honest... Life got CRAZY as soon as my Honey left again! Most nights I didn't even sit down until after 11p.m., let alone pick up my computer to blog or be able to go & visit any of you guys! BUT, I am soooo HAPPY to say that the 3 weeks he was to be gone is FINALLY OVERRRRRRRR!!!!!! PRAISE. THE. LORD!
I am still a little bewildered that Melson didn't even mention Sara Zarr. (Once Was Lost, How to Save a Life.) As a writer of books which model Christian families living lives which include both faith and failures, her books strike a quietly, solidly realistic tone.
I also found the above baking cup helped in building these owls. It's Wilton's ruffled baking cup. I made two batches of cupcakes, chocolate and vanilla. One batch I backed in regular, decorative cups, and the other in the ruffled. Because of the little edge all around, it held the eyes and ears up a little better. I really wished I'd used this type of baking cup for all of them.
Nikki (who just had a complete conversation with a fat, lazy tuxedo cat)
I got out all my fun stuff for a day and took pictures, and now I'm forcing you to enjoy them too! Plus, it's January, and January is so freaking lousy with boredom and greyness, that I encourage all of you (and you men too--what the hell. Maybe you have a Boba Fett tie or something you've been dying to wear) to get out all those pretty things you miss, and roll around in them for an hour or two.
I love that picture here! Notice the lantern. Was Claude capturing that single moment of a blowing wind coming in? Fabulous!
I don't normally blog about my dog, but he is like one of our children, so here goes! We own a long-legged, black & white Jack Russell Terrier. His name is Chipper and he is 13 years old. Chipper has tons of personality and was quite crazy in his younger years. There is never a shadow or reflection he doesn't chase. He tries to eat the vacuum cleaner every time we pull it out. He barks when you pull out the pots and pans from the cabinet. (It is like he is trying to protect me from them, lol!) Our neighbors have a Rottweiler that must weigh a gazillion pounds. Chipper barks and tries to go after it, as if he is a big dog himself.
Now, Amy is caught inside an enclosed world where nothing makes sense. Godspeed's passengers have forfeited all control to Eldest, a tyrannical and frightening leader, and Elder, his rebellious and brilliant teenage heir.
Dearest ♥ Granddaughter Mariyka,
Even if - EVEN IF - the worst thing happens...then I know, more than ever before, that I am NOT alone in this country, and I am NOT the "fringe."
In 1969 Detective Inspector Stanley Chadwick is seconded to a district outside his regular patch to solve the murder of a young woman, who was found stabbed to death in a sleeping bag in the woods on the edge of the field that had served as the concert venue for the Brimleigh Festival in Yorkshire. Considering that 25,000 people had gathered to listen to Pink Floyd, Led Zeppelin and particularly the local group the Mad Hatters, who were just beginning to make it big, it had been peaceful weekend. The murder, however, was nasty, deliberate, and very hard to investigate given the noise and confusion.
orange studded with whole cloves
In a small bowl, stir together ground flax seed, almond milk, honey, and vanilla. Allow this mixture to sit and slightly thicken while you mix together the rest of the ingredients.
Please note that all those times above are in PST (GMT -7)! The time can be different in your country!
Place in the skillet, and cook a couple minutes on each side, until the pork chops are golden brown. Then blot the excess oil off on paper towels, and place them in a baking dish (9x13). You don't have to cook these all the way through, as they will finish cooking in the oven. Repeat with all the pork chops until they are all browned.
of all time
I just wanted to jump on real quick before we go out to play on our new water slide and share this adorable project that the kids and I made for their Daddy!
At the world championships for example a win is worth in regulation is worth 3 points whilst a win in overtime is 2 points. The reason for this is to separate the teams that win in regulation and those that don’t. In short situations like the world championships it is a success that prevents the confusing situation where the head to head record is used to separate teams on equal points.
This is one aspect to think about.
What do you think of the Lash Genius and the See And Be Seen Kit?
(Jay Livingston / Ray Evans - Won Academy Award for "Best Song")
"At the moment it would appear that it was a completely unprovoked and violent attack. "It was a sustained and violent attack that led to the death of a healthy and fit man. There is absolutely nothing at the moment to suggest to me that this is a racially motive attack." Police have appealed to anyone in the Pollokshields community who knows who killed Mr McKeeney, or who saw or heard the attack, to contact them.
